However, I do things that appear to excite irrational prejudice. I don't send my kids to school, for instance, and home education is one of those subjects that gets right up lots of people's noses without them having much idea of what it's all about.
And as I was creating I decided to make a card to have on hand because you can never have enough go to cards for those baby showers that seem to sneak up on you, so now I'm ahead of the game (for at least one card, lol!) This image is cut @ 4" and a few MS butterflies and another handmade flower added to my tag shaped pre-made card.
When our real life friends are included in the stories, we always have to ask permission first.
*exhale*
By 2007, cover 20,000 troops deployed were taking antidepressants and insomnia medication, as a means of treating post-traumatic stress disorder so they can be productive soldiers on the battlefield. In the past 10 years, well over 300,000 troops returning to their homes suffered from P.T.S.D., depression, and traumatic brain injuries. And how does our precious VA handles it, by giving them another metabolic cocktails of death.
We took home foley kits to practice on our own and I briefly considered trying it out on myself, just to see how much it hurt. I didn't do it, but the next day I told a small group of students that I had. No one batted an eye, and a few people said that they had considered it as well. I fessed up to the lie, but was somewhat concerned that my fellow students so readily believed me.
Meals – carb up cheat meal day!
Capt. Brian Hickey, 47, New York, N.Y.
● The “Totally Irresponsible” unrated edition
In other news, the hard drive still hasn't gone to the data place..partially because I'm too scared they won't be able to salvage anything. Partially because all our money heads towards Ethiopia these days (in theory) and so spending $1,000 to recover data that should have been backed up pains me to no end.
4. It is UNLIKELY (but in no way impossible) that people will have guns sitting out on tables. If they do, ask them politely to put them away. This has only happened once so far to my professor.
Cheikh Tidiane Seck: organ
I realised that half the negative things I say about myself are because a) I think that is how others see me, b) if they expect too much from me and I disappoint them later then they might say hurtful things, c) they say so many self-abasing things about themselves that they do not give me permission to say I am perfect! d) I’m afraid they will call me arrogant and hurt me.
about $80 to run. Public domain software platforms now exist where we
The frozen, dried, salted or canned fish must be within the validity period. The frozen fish should be well packed in tightly closed and sealed packaging. Opt for transparent packaging allowing analysis of the product. The meat should not be discolored, stained or spotted. Note that there is no irregular formation of ice that can form by freezing and thawing.
What really matters is the price at the pump. When these new rules take effect, on January 2nd, look for the price of gas to rise dramatically. Frankly, the Republicans in the House can put a stop to this by simply refusing to fund the EPA.
This Friday will be the last Shaved Ice day at PE. Please remember to send $1.50 cash.
Long story short is that he and some friends were walking home from school when a car slowed down and yelled some obscenities out the window to Jackson and his friends. One of the kids' parent called the police to report it. Jackson told her what kind of a car it was and what the driver looked like, but said that he didn't really hear what was said.
“It is a troublesome issue,” Pongsak Preechawit said of the country’s generally poor English proficiency. “Language is vital. It’s is necessary that the labor force start learning and understanding the importance of the universal language: English.”
Hello friends! I hope you had a lovely Mother's Day weekend. I cleared 4 yucky ant-attracting shrubs (viburnum) and countless daylilies from a flower bed that will become an herb and tomato bed. Yay! I've missed fresh herbs and home grown tomatoes and really look forward to their yumminess.
Speaking of the real world, my specialty is helping people find their own best carry method—the one that works with your actual lifestyle, not just something you can use on the range—so I bring a pile of holsters and other carry gear to class. We discuss the good, the bad, and the ugly concealed carry in a very no-nonsense and practical way. Cornered Cat isn't afraid to tackle the embarrassing questions you might not feel comfortable asking elsewhere, either! I know you have a life outside the range, and that you don't want to look all lumpy and bulgy, so I help you find a carry method that truly works for the way you actually live and we discuss the nitty-gritty of making that work for you.
I don’t know how it happened. I suppose I could reel out all the same old tired excuses. I never paid you enough attention. I was too tired from work to even look in your direction. The age old story told since man was birthed onto this little rock that we call home. But however you choose to dress it up; you were gone from my life, never to return.
Sometimes I get so involved that I some how make myself sick ~ for instance.. this summer started out with Trek
Alderman Griffiths was local-born and headmaster of nearby primary school, Fir Tree Lane. Mr.Walker lived in Hamstead Garden Suburb. Peter Griffiths lost his seat in March 1966 to Andrew Faulds (Labour) who lived in Stratford –upon-Avon!
Can you talk about affinity?
Storage of Aspirin
It says, simply: "Your character is bound by natural laws - we can fudge and cheat these to a certain degree, but the audience relates to these laws."
As far as witnesses are concerned, generally they are not “independent” simply because people involved in a dispute or incident are most likely to be the ones there. Even though some people may have had an axe to grind with Tommy Sheridan, that does not automatically render their testimony valueless. If only “unconnected” witnesses had given evidence at the High Court, then the trial would have lasted days, not months!
It will not be this hard forever. As the light becomes brighter and brighter the darkness will start to fade……
879 D-V/13/1984. “On the Study of Political Philosophy.” Panel on Teaching Political Theory, Annual Meeting, Midwest Political Science Association, Marc Plaza Hotel, Milwaukee, Wisconsin. (The other panelists were Thomas S. Engeman, Jane Mansbridge, Michael Wemstein, and James L. Wiser.)
Day 2: It occurs to me to tell someone in case I die during the three months The Prestigious Publication will take to get back to me. I decide to tell my husband over leftovers but not before making him guess about “the crazy thing I did.”
His humility really came through as he thanked his band, managers and promoters who sang his praises and talked about his success, which Rahat Ji put down to his fans.
The commission said that in the interim, “If PRTC were to receive additional support for voice service pursuant its proposed non-rural insular mechanism, it likely would be more difficult to transition that support to focus on areas unserved or underserved by broadband.”
Are you gasping in surprise? I pretty much did when I figured it out. I've always thought of myself as an extrovert...
And then suddenly they are passing you with an insufferably calm and steady step, while you are huffing along desperately? It is pretty sad. It hasn't happened to me in a while, but still, it's the principle!
Chicken Tagine with Fennel and Onion
Via Bloomberg:
Kleenex
So, today I took a hike. Literally. To remind myself why I had moved my family back to Colorado. To remind myself why I left corporate America nearly a year ago and never looked back (except to laugh and sing na-na-na on occasion). To remind myself why I got into the Word Slut business in the first place. And to find some sand in which to draw a few lines.
Just make sure you get there early to get a taste of Tempest's beers before they run out. It's going to be sooner rather than later.
Anarchocapitalists. They fucked up the country and wanna scream about the evils of socialism. Idiotic assholes.
Only a minority wanted to kill Salman Rushdie? –
The advantage, little known to the taxpaying public, is that having fewer required work-hours can free up these staffers to do campaign work that legally can’t be done while punched in on the state clock, insiders say. Or, in other cases, the workers are able to focus on their nongovernment side jobs.
I was impressed with the sharp attention to detail, particularly during the big NYC climax scene near the film’s end. After seeing Hawkeye (Jeremy Renner), effortlessly shoot about a trillion arrows, I asked myself…does he ever run out? What happened next was exactly what an acrobat would have done in the comic books. Good script-writing.
- I was kissed under the mistletoe. -
Could I be any happier?
Paul had a thorn in the flesh which he called in 2 Corinthians 12:7, a messenger of Satan. God allowed it. In fact He permitted it to continue throughout his life and for what reason? It was to show His grace as all-sufficient. To use the words of God in verse 9, “My grace is sufficient for thee; for my strength is made perfect in weakness.”
Seattle- A recent field trip took us to the educational center of IslandWood. A few years ago, Washington state mandated that all 4th, 5th, and 6th graders be educated on the environment. An important side note is that this bill was unfunded. Rising to the call, a non-profit agency created an educational center on 255 acres in the woods of Bainbridge Island.
" is not only a "how-to" guide, complete with easy-to-follow instructions and diagrams, but it is also full of professional color photographs of historic couture garments, from Worth, Mainbocher, Chanel, YSL, and many more. Seeing the diagram of the technique, reading the description of how it is done, and then seeing an example of it used on a stunning garment...well, that's worth a thousand words.
-BLOOD on Cena!
When the image is cut out, you can add little bit drop shadow, if you like. And remember save the file as .png, so you hard work don't go to waste (see previous tutorial).
And I have to admit - I felt a little more badass after changing a tire all by myself.
Dear Father, thank You for showing me the importance of being diligent in whatever is committed to my hands. I make up my mind to put my entire self into what I do and do things right the first time, for that is the path of excellence and promotion. I thank You for bringing me into places of influence, in Jesus Christ Name! Amen!
2. Combine the garlic paste, egg yolks, pepper and lemon juice in a medium bowl with a whisk. Stand the bowl on a wetted-and-wrung-out tea towel on the work surface so as to keep bowl stable and hands free to manipulate whisk and oil.
All heart-broke, I heard her say:
My flavor of the week,
*One of the new TGF stamps (Oh Boy Ian or Sweet Anya)
I was excited about going ice fishing for the first time. I gathered my new fishing tools and frozen smelt bait and walked out onto the snow covered ice several hundred yards from the shore of Big Wood Pond, in front of our log cabin.
Wooden butterfly colour with promarker finished off with lace, buttons and string.
2. How Not to be Popular by Jennifer Ziegler – I really liked this book, it was extremely cute and an easy read. I think I read it in a few hours one afternoon, I couldn’t put it down.
off a veritble feast
The video also reminds Americans to wear a Guy Fawkes mask at the protests and to seek support from the local Occupy movement. They also advise people to stage the rallies “across the street from the headquarters or buildings so as to not get evicted or arrested.”
10. Spanish Harlem 1963
I'll have even snowier pictures to show you shortly, but in the meanwhile the big news around here is that the eldest (finally) has a 'bit of a sore tooth'. At 7 and a half years old I was getting a little worried, but hopefully this will be the start of a charming gap-toothed smile.
My favorite part of the whole video is Clay doing the air quotes about "Mom is going to leave me."
Writing for me is also an emotional outlet and a way of discovering why I feel the way I do. While struggling to deal with the death of my long-time mate, I poured out my heart and my soul and my grief into journal entries, letters to my deceased mate, and blog posts. I don’t know if I could have survived without that outlet. A book compiled of some of the best writings of that time, Grief: The Great Yearning, has now been published, yet when I wrote during this time (except for the blogs, of course), I had no expectation of my words ever being read. I wrote for me.
March 24, 2012 – Saturday of the Fourth Week of Lent. The reading is from Gospel of John 7:40-52
I’m not done looking around my classroom.
And as far as Republicans go. They should be for extending the relief and cuts because the economy is still in the shitter. They should be up there saying, “Yes, we need to provide this economic relief because the President’s economic policies have failed this country and this generation of recent and future college graduates. They need help, and this President is doing nothing to brighten their economic future. We will pass this extension of temporary assistance AND X,Y, and Z (Whatever economic recovery plans GOP leadership wants to insert in their would be fine), to help recent and future college graduates.”
In Britain, Hundreds and Thousands are merely Sprinkles. Little candy coated bits of sugar that are used to decorate and adorn cakes, cookies, and even buttered slices of bread for fairy tea parties. Sprinkles add pop to our ice cream sundaes, sparkle to our rice krispie treats, and imagination to every dessert they touch.
But, no, he chose Gates of Vienna. I guess today is just our lucky day.
My brother bought me bookcases for my birthday and I spent a good part of last week bringing all my book-books (meaning non-text books non-reference books non-I won’t be embarrassed if people saw these in my bookcase books) upstairs from the basement and arranging them in alphabetical order by author. Would have done it by color, but try explaining that…
2d for a Scottish pint = 4d per gallon (or a third of a shilling)
When you hit "Subscribe" a pop up window will ask you to confirm your request by entering a captcha phrase. (Yeah, I hate those too!) You will then get an email with a link to click to confirm your subscription. It's that easy. Never miss an update on my blog again!
But I want to accurate–Asians are not the only victims during those early hours of the riot:
Fast forward to one day a few weeks ago. While sitting in our family room, I gazed over at the lovely dresser (another Craigslist find) and thought to myself,
But as the fable goes, conservative hero Barry Goldwater opposed the 1964 Civil Rights Act in order to appeal to racists in the South, and for that reason, the GOP started to lose the black vote. The reality is that Goldwater didn’t have a racist bone in his body. As Ann Coulter tells HUMAN EVENTS in our sit-down interview, Goldwater founded the NAACP chapter in Arizona, integrated the Arizona National Guard and ended racial segregation in his family-owned department stores. In other words, Goldwater was a vociferous foe of race discrimination, and actively fought to abolish all the Jim Crow laws that Democrat politicians adopted.
110. Naked Lunch: William Burroughs
Flayer of The Hatebound (my personal favorite, so many tricks can be done with this card)
We packed our suitcases, walked down to Lough Derg one more time, and then for dinner had a wonderful meal at The Derg Inn. The food was wonderful and in particular, Sherri had a curry dish that she raved about for the remainder of the trip. We all really enjoyed the dinner.
Absolutely. Life is rough, get used to it.
On a white background i stamp the swirl with embossing powder than
I pray for all of you, my brothers and sisters, and I love you dearly.
1/2 C PLUS 1 T firmly packed light brown sugar
In the last twenty-five years we've seen the onset and sunset of the assault weapons ban, and we've seen our country go from just a couple of states with concealed carry to forty-nine with some type of concealed carry... with the state of Chicago... er... I mean Illinois... being the only one left without gun rights for the average citizen to protect themselves... but things seem to be changing.
Too soon, I'm back from hot, sunny Mexico...Back to school on Monday already! Where did this spring break go? I had a fabulous week, got slightly sunburned while snorkeling, spent hours catching up on my reading on the beach, hung out with my friend/coworker who went on the trip with me, ate really, really well...Now it's back to real life - and let's just say this spring break was not productive in the way it usually is - but I'm not complaining!
Then there was the race riot. Leaving it out would be a glaring omission, it must be talked about. I will write about that.
I am utterly hooked on this guy, why? I’ll tell you why! Because even though I have been a complete and utter bitch to him. Even though he did the right thing and didn’t cross a line when I visited and got (ashamingly wasted) and hat fact that he laughed when I almost called him babe. He always got my heart to go all wack. What is wrong with me?!
destruction to the Glory of God’s Justice…stop letting Arminian FOOLS lie to
A change in the norm is always interesting and exciting . . . . doubt this will ever happen again (at least to us)!
I love your Eskimo kisses,
operation. Her right eye was heavily bandaged and still swollen. Doctors
Peace 'n' Cheers
Morapela accused Magashule of corruption and said the long-standing provincial ANC chairperson, who is pro-Zuma, should be replaced at the province’s conference next year.
Boost Pain (Psionic)
Pursuing an opportunity like this isn't a substitute for addressing our present challenges on earth. My long-time readers know that I'm very interested in--and was even briefly involved in--space solar power. Its potential is also enormous, but that doesn't mean we should stop drilling for the hydrocarbons we'll need for the next several decades, while developing the renewable energy sources and other technologies that will help to reduce our greenhouse gas emissions. Space solar power isn't a bridge to a future energy technology; it's the kind of technology toward which we need a bridge. I view space resources in much the same light. We talk a lot about the impact on the climate a century from now of the emissions we're producing today. Why wouldn't we also plan for the resource base that the world of the late 21st century might need, unless we expect our descendants to be many fewer in number and so frugal that they consume less per person than the citizens of today's least developed countries? That vision might appeal to some environmentalists, but it doesn't appeal to me.
Police said that Lloyd had raped the girls in Din Daeng, Hua Lamphong, Sukhumvit and Pattaya.
3. What’s next with the wedding, gotta get on that list, today in hope taking over, I considered the months I could push it forward and how much fun it would be to get a “move the date up” card. oh hope, you are so silly sometimes.
She was fond of flowers,
To quote a very famous man, I have a dream.
09/02/09 SELL XAUUSD 0.01 963.90 10/15/2010 1366.86 -402.39
I do recommend this for the novice. It's an easy way to enter into nail art or ease into trying different colors. As always, Pure Ice is very affordable. However, I do not have the price point for this but I presume that it will be under $10. This collection will be available at Walmart and should be popping upon shelves now.
Hauth JC. Alternative analysis of the review of work during pregnancy. Womens Health Issues 1992; 2: 52-53.
Manufacturer/Distributor: Pitini Enterprises (found in several stores but we will use WalMart.com here)
The first test between the British and Irish Lions and South Africa's Springboks will take place later in Durban.
That’s really it for the pros. I really hate this thing…first of all it’s ugly.
This will hopefully convince BDUK, the broadband funding arm of Government that we’d like first crack at (and to dig deep into) the money-pot for rural broadband expansion in our area.
“Well, I, ah…yeah. I guess so. What did you say about recruit for some squad?”
A 5K is hard because it feels like an all-out sprint for 3.1 miles. Which, when coupled with the cheese hangover and the fact that I am ridiculously out of shape (I was gasping for breath and getting passed by people running with their dogs -- awesome), is its own special kind of torture.
There were skinny jeans wearing, scraggly beard growing granola types and uber-moms trying desperately to educate their over stimulated children, there were teenagers plugged in and tuned out to the centuries of wonder they were passing through, and dads rushing the family along so he could get home to "the game" -- whatever game it was.
ES: Yeah, I guess you can say that the “Smashing Machine” is kind of my alter ego (laughs).
Top with the slaw mix; sprinkle with almonds,
Suburban Nature is out on iTunes right now as a digital download, and will be out in May from Kirtland Records, and the thing’s just a stunner. Seriously: the last time I was this excited about a new singer was, I don’t know, a decade+ ago, hearing Richard Buckner for the first time (let’s be fair: I’ve dug Throw Me the Statue and Bon Iver and Ritter and Spoon and everyone else, but in terms of just pure singing power? In terms of voice? It’s not even close). Jaffe’s opening shows in May for Norah Jones and, hopefully later in the summer, will be coming to venues near enough to all of us. Sarah was kind enough to answer some questions recently, and they’re below:
Of all the places I’ve travelled, I have little record, although my camera was always with me, I rarely used it due to being too busy. A great shame.
A few years ago, the Catskill borscht circuit featured a 15 year old boy who sang and danced with a specialty review made up of young kids.
Long story short. Or well, long story not quite as long as I could make it - he wanted to keep me in the hospital overnight on IV antibiotics, but I played the "I have six kids at home" card and after consulting with my primary doctor, decided to let me go home. I have to take two antibiotics that cost me $350! Yikes! And I have to go 48 more hours without eating. I can have clear liquids. Yum. And I have to rest. Yeah right! Snort! Sure, I'll rest with six kids at home. That's a good one!
There are times over the past year that I wished I'd never made the decision to have a family. That's a new one for me. I went into the endeavor thinking that if I did everything 'right' that things would, you know, turn out right. Which in retrospect was astonishingly naive of me. Had I been raising feeder mice perhaps that expectation might have proven closer to the mark; feeder mice don't cause a lot of drama and either way you end up feeding them to anacondas. During the course of this past year, there were people in my life that I would have liked to have fed to anacondas. I would be surrounded by obese anacondas right now. Obese, non-dramatic anacondas.
But what about the normal locos, like me? "Cockadoodee" just wouldn't capture the violent eruption of emotion I would feel, say, when I realize 30 minute into cooking that I forgot to change farenheit to celsius, or that I added 1 cup of salt instead of 1 cup of sugar. These events beg for a long string of swear words like, shitfuckdamncocksucker, don't they?
Which was rude and which was mean? And wouldn’t it have made more sense if she were my sister or my best friend as opposed to someone I was just meeting at a tweetup?
The task for next week is more reading out of our work. This time it will be a passage selected from wherever we want within our first chapters, to be read by the tutor so as to give the work the same ‘voice’. I can see this is going to cause me to pore over my work before then, to find a section worthy of being delivered to 15 or so critics. I might well end up changing or adding in whole new sections. There’s no better test than having your work read out, though.
About a week ago the people at TeamBuy contacted me to participate in a Spring Challenge.
And finally I cut the pieces out of leather and stitch them together. The eyepieces fit nicely, however the beak opening is too large. I will have to adjust the pattern and try again.
You may think “But Alvin, a novel about a gamer tranny? that seems way overrated because an “in-game gender swap” is not that uncommon (at least not this days)”, well, point taken, but not true, not at all, because in the futuristic setting in which the novel takes place, this is not possible, the game scans your gender and that’s what you get in-game, but, by the weird things that happen in life, she was the firs player to log into the game, and because of that she got a special wish, which was, as you may have already deduced, become 30% more beautiful male. This gender change wasn’t because of transsexual things going on in Feng Lan’s head (the real life name of Prince), but to prove her obnoxious brother that women can also play without help from other players.
Let me start off by saying that an experience like I've gone through changes your life completely...for a little while, at least. It can be a good change or a bad change. It can be revolutionary or momentary. I wish that I could say that it was a monumental change in this girl that changed the course of my life forever. I wish that I could say that it made me a stronger, more passionate person about God and living for Him. I wish I could say that it did away with some of my selfishness and sinfulness.
- View God as cop/ police, militant. (Not relational)
I have used 3 of the products myself.
16 up
Tamil people celebrate Tamil new year either on 13 or 14 April. Every year in the month of Chitterai (the first month of the Tamil solar calendar in April), in the temple city of Madurai, the Chitterai Thiruvizha is celebrated in the Meenakshi Temple. A huge exhibition is held, called Chitterai Porutkaatchi. In some parts of Southern Tamil Nadu, it is called Chitterai Vishu. The day is marked with a feast in Tamil homes and entrances to the houses are decorated elaborately with kolams. In most parts of India, one can see neem trees blooming with their flowers and the first batch of mangoes hanging prominently. This day is celebrated by some communities with neem flowers and raw mangoes to symbolize growth and prosperity.
Here's what you need to gather:
And then, despair to be fought.
Has anyone else had an success stories with Basic products, or other supermarkts cheap label? Anything which is aboslutely ghastly? I found this fantastic blog called Back to Sainsburys Basics where the blogger uses basics to cook, so check it out if you're interested in going ultra cheap.
Time and time again, studies show that men say women who are good in bed are confident, playful, spontaneous and accepting. And incidentally, all these attributes won’t just make us better in bed, they will make us better at life.
may my heart show some wonders of rock n roll
Uppercaise and Sakmongkol in their Jan 16 postings updated respectively on the newspaper circulation numbers and kind of readership. We’re adding our 2 sen here on the Icker factor.
Well, that's it...2 post in one day.
THE MOUNTJOY NOVELS: A romantic comedy series, complete with ghosts, musicians, aristocrats and eccentrics. A witty romantic comedy to entrance and entertain, and leave you smiling.
Experts are aware of different versions and designs of parts of the vehicle make they specialize in. They are better positioned to advice you on the existing parts versions and their advantages. They are also aware of any upgrades in the parts in question and can therefore give you informed options for maximum performance of your vehicle.
I’d asked pretty much everyone relevant, and then went back to my car, scanning the lot once more and going into my truck for my gym bag. On a whim, I checked a small zipper pocket where I always keep my lock, extra hair ties and Gu, and my garmin when I bring it….AND THERE IT WAS. Why I put it there, I have no idea, but I bolted back inside and said I’d found it in a place I NEVER stash it, and apologized for the chaos. Oy. But at least I found it!
The A20 also crosses the Darent here, the riverside path tunnelling beneath. I too cross the river, by a wooden footbridge. Just beyond, the path leads into Farningham. Despite the proximity to two very busy roads, the village still retains its picturesque charm, featuring attractive brick and flint vernacular cottages, a grand bay-windowed inn – which Charles Dickens visited when fishing the Darent for trout – and a substantial white weatherboarded building, once a watermill.
Oxfam Policy Adviser Claire Godfrey said the organisation fully supported the call for aid to be targeted better.
Ps If you are into the Twilight series, I recommend watching the HBO show TrueBlood. Its sooo good.
4. Cool down the pani and stain well. Serve Chilled.
4 months wasn't long enough to understand that when you take the words "Cure" and "Hope" away from doctors..... They become simply people........ They no longer have the answers......... They look just as helpless as all the other faces around you.........
Here's a gorge! I'll be compressed.
also Red Meat (from San Francisco)
Hello. My name is Reagen, and I have a sugar addiction.
And as for worshiping a God based on my upbringing…it is true that if I were born in another country I would probably worship and different God than I do right now. I would probably have a different Holy Book and follow different customs. Indeed, my Christian upbringing has certainly influenced my choice to follow Christ. However, it was not until Kazakhstan that I chose to make Christianity my own belief and not just the belief of my parents. In doing so and actually researching the bible and comparing it to other religions I have learned that no other religion has as much evidence for it as the bible and no other religion has as personal a God who would willingly make such an unbelievable sacrifice for the people he loves. Indeed there is no other figure in history who was as influential as Jesus Christ. How do I know? Look at the numbers. 2.1 Billion people have claimed Christ as their savior around the world. Islam is the only other religion that comes close to it with 1.5 billion followers. As for God testing Job, he allowed Satan to test Job to bring glory to himself and to prove Satan wrong. And don’t forget the end of the story Job receives even more than he had before he was tested and was blessed by God greatly. As for God killing all of the Firstborn Egyptians, he didn’t kill them because of their disbelief in him. He killed them because of Pharaoh’s refusal to let his people leave Egypt and he only sent the final plague after warning Pharaoh with six earlier plagues and a warning with each one. Pharaoh is the one who can be held responsible for the death’s of all those firstborn including his own. My God is not an “asshole”. He created the human race which he loves very much, enough to send his own son as a sacrifice in order to save not only our earthly lives but our souls as well so that we could have a personal relationship with him on earth and also go to live with him in paradise when our services to him were no longer needed on earth John 3:16. If you can name another religion in the world with God like that who has as much evidence in his favor I’d like to hear it. You can check out this link for more information on the bibles historical accuracy if you like.
Weather: 85
“The country is going to have to make a choice whether to go along with green ideas of renewable generation or go back to coal and nuclear power.”
There’s a lot to like, for me, about Koko and Jormungand the anime. It’s great to see Iwasaki being fun to listen to again. It’s unfortunate that the radio drama cast didn’t carry over again but I’ll live. Koko’s shotacon ships also adds to that wolf-ness, don’t you think? Like, she’s gonna eat him whole? LOL. I think White Fox’s got a solid hit on their hands again.
Two factors which are directly relevant to Robinson’s case are:
What happened is that the bishop anointed my forehead, told me to be good and do my homework, winked at me, and then turned to the next kid in line.
However, according to our further exclusive information, Campbell has separately held extensive private meetings in KL with Najib and that the main topic was advising him on how to win the next election.
My conversation with Luis focused on two strands – what was this like and how had IBM been able to cross the culture barrier. Let’s start with the Culture Barrier.
So I armed myself with the materials I thought I'd need..
Simply put, if WE don't like a certain breeder, or said certain breeder does not DO what WE do, or WOULD DO, then they are less than human and should be banished to the deepest pits of hell. Nothing a dog breeder does is EVER good enough; everyone that owns dogs, or breeds, has their own "ideas" of "what a breeder should do or be". No topic is off limits, every action --or inaction-- is subject to being bashed by those that need to feel superior by being self-proclaimed experts while hiding behind a computer keyboard.
7pm
The first principle to success is to have a plan. without it, any road can lead you to roam and not Rome, the destination that you have in mind. Then we have to ask ourselves some hard questions like what are the secrets of success? What are the measurements of success? We have to look at the vital points for achieving success. Then we can redefine failures as stepping-stones on the road to success. Indeed, there are ways to reframe or reset our minds by resorting to systematic coaching for success.
Then there are the conclusive words of Christ in Matthew 24:23-24.
1 small zucchini, cut into strips
Add the batter into your pan, and bake for about 40-45 minutes till the toothpick comes out clean.
There really is something to be said for the old adage that work is something you do when you’d rather be doing something else. Or something like that. However the saying goes it holds equally true that if you get to ‘work’ at something you really enjoy, you don’t question why it is – you just embrace it.
Today, according to the nurse and Chris who has been up there already, they’re both doing good. Still on the 3.0L flow, but Colton has been lower on his oxygen and hasn’t had any real spells. The speech pathologist (who I had no idea does eating readiness checks in the preemie world) came in for her consult at noon to see if they are ready to feed. Shockingly, Colton did better with her tests which I guess include muscle tone of the mouth, sucking on the binky, etc… They also fed him 17mL through a bottle and he did well – a few sips and then a few breaths. He was much better “coordinated” was the term they used. Keltie was a little more disjointed – she was forgetting the breathing part but she still managed to take down 13mL. The speech pathologist will be back on Saturday, so we’re going to make sure we’re up there for that so we can meet her and learn more about everything. I believe they’re hoping to start trying one bottle a day for them soon – which is super exciting!
Adapted from the Cook’s Academy Curriculum, Dublin
The report dealt (as you might expect) with organisational matters but - in setting the all-important context for its recommendations - it's author rightly concluded that we shall be forced into industrial action.
Stamps: Sweet n Sassy Stamps - Treasured
Rumfoord is merciless in his machinations and effortless in lies. He sacrifices lives to save humanity, but the same time he’s indifferent towards everything. His omniscience and potency to alter on a massive scale are traditionally traits of the storyteller. Rumfoord has become God and the Devil, but is also lesser when compared to the alien Solo. Clear indication that no matter how much power a man accumulates he’s insignificant when facing space.
I snapped up this dress on the bargain rail at Primark for just £5.00.
Onion soup is an amazing kind of recipe. I searched for different kinds of onion soup, but the French version is the most popular, if not the only one out there. It has everything one could ever ask for in the attempt to using up whatever is lying around: onions, leftover beef stock, stale bread, and cheese you haven’t used up yet. It is a stick-to-your-ribs kind of soup, rich and dense, with essentially all of the main food groups provided. So to no offense of the French, since I have the privilege of knowing quite a few amazing people from the country, I made my own kind of onion soup, something lighter and with a homemade chicken stock base. What’s so marvelous about this recipe is that you essentially have two meals: the onion soup and the chicken and veggies for another day. (You can also place the meats and veggies from the stock at the bottom for additional nutrition.) I made skillet cornbread, modifying the ingredients but otherwise made the same way as I usually do.
UPDATE MARCH, 2010.
But what I think of is what's in my bucket list (not just for me) but as a mom and all the things I want to do with my kids before they grow up.
2. The songs. They are also wonderfulness, primarily because Joss Whedon was involved with their making.
Rita is a Lantean from the Pegasus galaxy who traveled to Earth during the evacuation of Atlantis more than 10,000 years ago. While much of her equipment was, by necessity, left behind in Atlantis, she sought to continue her work in the Milky Way.
Change like death and taxes are the three things we must learn to deal with in life.
Hair - 1.25 inch circle and 1/2 inch circle
Taemin : To us, there is something that makes us really proud of – that is everyone who is standing in front of us supporting us. Music has been coined as a universal language, however, being able to put aside our lacking Japanese and our cultural differences, and to receive all the love from everyone who were able to feel our music, to us this is even more moving than music. To all the fans around the world in front of the screen, I want to express (our/my) thankfulness. Similarly, to all the Japanese fans who were able to feel the same as us, I am thankful from the bottom of my heart. Really.. really really thankful.
Owner Ghulam Rasool told the Examiner: “My vision is to make this the best independent department store in the area.
The 40-year isolated incarceration of Albert Woodfox and Herman Wallace “pushes the boundaries of cruel, inhuman and degrading treatment, and flies in the face of international standards to which the US is a party,” stated Everette Harvey Thompson, Southern Office Regional Director of Amnesty International USA.
For the first time in my adulthood, I have finally accepted myself. I was freakin’ born this way and I’m awesome.
Dawn Meehan
Tom Allen (2000) asserts that Deane J’s approach has at least arguably been subsequently accepted by the Court as a whole, citing cases including Georgiadis, Mewett and Mutual Pools. Allen summarises Deane J’s approach as follow:
Posted on Jan 25, 2011, Source: TomDispatch.com
Bananas are good for your blood.
US President Barack Obama has returned to America, leaving behind him a love struck continent enthralled by his Rock Star status and ability to say things people want to hear. However, is that down to what he says or the manner in which what he says is reported, and, more importantly, what he doesn't say.
Only for a few to see
Patterned: K&Company
It’s never been this close before
My love of these characters was perfect
Do they give more of a shit about me than my wife? No. My kid? No.
However, for Colin Powell, it was another chance to impress the brass. Without interviewing the soldier, Cpl. Tom Glen, Powell simply accepted a claim from Glen’s superior officer that Glen was not close enough to the front lines to know what he was writing about.
(served with ice cold vodka)
You have until 2 am Ohio time, ( 8am CET, 7 am UK time) Wed 30th November to join in
Review: I have to admit, Scrivener is pretty awesome. If you are an unorganized or chaotic writer (like yours truly), this program is excellent at putting it all together. My favorite feature is the binder. This awesome feature gives you the ability to separate the chapters into individual "clickable" files in a list on the left side. Comes in very handy when you need to click & drag chapters around or figure out the word count for each chapter. It also has a whole slew of cool features that will allow you to organize, research, track, take notes, and construct your manuscript piece by piece or as one big whole project. If you are like me, I have tons (TONS I say) of research stored on my computer in various files. With Scrivener, you can upload it all along with any pictures and have it easily accessible at your fingertips in one spot. Pretty cool.
1 T. olive oil
Daddy and I love Japanese food. Give us sushi on any day and we wouldn’t mind, even if it means clumsily having to capture our food with chopsticks before we devour it. However, given daddy’s health conditions (he’s a heart patient since a year now), we’ve all cut down on our food indulgences, trying to be health conscious and all that. Anyway, coming back to Japanese, Zuma is one among the many top notch restaurants that Dubai has to offer. It is known to serve excellent Japanese and Asian cuisine and after the Saturday of 24th March, 2012, I cannot agree more.
Decisions on Hague Abduction Convention applications can be appealed to the Court of Appeals. The delay for a hearing before the Court of Appeals can exceed one year. However, the French Central Authority may request that the scheduling of the appeal be accelerated. Typically, a party is given 30 days to appeal a decision.
Note from Dave: I’ve seen this film and it is beautifully done – a must see! Not a documentary – just walk with Tinh as he wanders the streets and fields of his homeland, taking in the colorful sights and sounds. Check out the trailer (link below) and Tinh’s webpage.
"with the ink now drying on the document and the US officially committed to the occupation of Afghanistan for another decade, officials are continuing to tout 2014 as the “end” of the war. This speaks to how the 2024 date, though openly discussed by the Karzai government in Afghanistan and privately acknowledged as part of the secret pact, has not been publicly presented to the American public. When they will officially spring it on us remains unclear."....
**I went to check on the green beans after writing this post…..and they’ve all germinated. Like I said, CRAP.
Thought you might like this one. Its a photo that I took with my iphone of my daughter’s cat who decided to get comfortable in the middle of her coat on the dining room table.
Regional Representative
So, OK. Throughout the book, we've seen that love has a real cost. Jamie and Claire have built a relationship through honest struggle, a relationship that's _worth_ what it's cost them. This is the final challenge, and Jamie's willing to pay what will apparently be the ultimate cost.
Wednesday also turned out to be the deadliest day of tornadoes in the U.S. since April 3, 1974 when 310 people perished.
CEO of The Climate Group Steve Howard offered a similar analysis. “A clean industrial revolution is not only possible, but it is well underway in the world’s leading states, cities and regions,” he told COP16 attendees at the “Climate Leaders Summit” in Cancun Wednesday. “The subnational governments in our Alliance are not waiting for a global agreement but are forging agreements of their own to lead a growing global market for low-carbon goods and services already estimated at $4.7 trillion.”
This year, Cameron and I will be by ourselves for Easter and so our plans are fairly simple--we're planning on going to church and then going out for brunch here. (I'm already counting down the minutes until Sunday when I will no doubt be in food coma heaven!) It will definitely be different than last year when we hosted some out of town friends for Easter, but I'm actually looking forward to having a low-key celebration and letting someone else cook and clean up! So even though I won't be baking and crafting this year, I thought I'd share some of my favorite springtime pins for those of you in need of ideas! Enjoy!
Woe betide him if he does not listen. The most striking instance of this happened in recent history. In 1956 the then Prime Minister, Sir Anthony Eden… launched a war to regain the Suez Canal. It had scarcely begun when the City let it be known that in a few days he would have no more money to fight it; the Pound would collapse. He stopped the war and was turned out of office by his party. When the Prime Minister rises to address the Lord Mayor’s banquet, he hopes that the City will put more behind him than the gold plate lavishly displayed on the sideboards.”
Cast it like smoke into the air
An ethics watchdog group is using the hacking scandal in the United Kingdom to call on the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) to cancel Fox’s broadcast licenses.
stress its importance.
this week's thrifty find is a folded measuring stick. i found this beauty at the same flea market as my tea box. it's actually from the same vendor! it was marked $15 but crossed out and marked down to $5. when the seller wouldn't budge on the price of the tea box i asked if he would throw the ruler in for free. when he said "yes", i was stoked!
he's the one smiling with every lap.
We wouldn’t be debating the reality of climate change. Governments and corporations would recognize that fossil fuel production is far too expensive in its total impact on Earth resources, biosystems and human health to be sustained anyway. What is the logic in amassing ultimate wealth if to do so you destroy the very basis of that wealth production?
My love for walking
"Remember the things I have done in the past.
And this pretty jacket just couldn’t wait to be worn. I love it. That man of mine continues to have the most amazing thrift-fu around.
The Samaritan Woman
I despise racism. I despise anyone who hates someone else because of the colour of their skin. It is pathetic. We are all human beings. However, what I hate most about many of the local Muslims is their words and deeds. Their words are duplicitous and dishonest. Their deeds are dastardly and vicious. They want nothing more than to seize what is rightfully ours, our only and irreplaceable homeland, England, and with murderous violence enforce a fascist system of government where not even your thoughts would be your own. This is a mortal threat to every non-Muslim man, woman and child of our land. We must begin the fight back. We must at least challenge what has so-far been an easy walk over for them.
In spite of Nietzsche’s criticism of the romantics, his outlook owes much to them; it is that of aristocratic anarchism, like Byron’s, and one is not surprised to find him admiring Byron. He attempts to combine two sets of values which are not easily harmonized: on the one hand he likes ruthlessness, war, and aristocratic pride; on the other hand, he loves philosophy and literature and the arts, especially music. Historically, these values coexisted in the Renaissance; Pope Julius II, fighting for Bologna and employing Michelangelo, might be taken as the sort of man whom Nietzsche would wish to see in control of governments. It is natural to compare Nietzsche with Machiavelli, in spite of important differences between the two men… Both have an ethic which aims at power and is deliberately anti-Christian, though Nietzsche is more frank in this respect. What Caesar Borgia was to Machiavelli, Napoleon was to Nietzsche: a great man defeated by petty opponents.
Last year, one of my favorite beers was Lagunitas' Imperial Red Ale. Hoppy, rich, super flavorful, and only about $8.99 per six-pack made it a great find AND a great bargain.
Warning: it’s not like on MV I guess…
One such advert that used to come up in times of need is probably one of my favouries and it’s the story of J R hartley and his hunt to find ‘The art of fly fishing’ via tedious door-to-door methods.
Susie also commented that "He can spank me till the cows come home but it is my responsibility to make the internal changes that better both myself and our marriage. As we women often say, our submission is a gift that we give our husbands. It can't be spanked into us"
When they find in any one a germ of suspicion or dislike of another, they stimulate the evil growth.
Create a card with lots of layers
"Advances should NOT go away. They are the element that keeps writers writing and dreaming. They’re part of the American Dream. Writers with a track-record of sales should be rewarded for their platform. It’s like a signing bonus in professional sports. You have talent so you get paid. Even the rookies have the opportunity of ‘big bucks’ if they’re talented enough or lucky enough (they can fill a niche). Removing advances is nothing but a blatant attempt at equalizing the playing field. And sadly, everybody ain’t equal. Some writers are definitely better than others, even if it’s just at promoting themselves. Why should they be punished for having talent or ability or promotional skills?
Froggish men, unpleasant to see
► I was driving down a dirt road the other day when I saw three huge piles with a sign on them saying, free mulch, compost and chips for town residents. I'm planning on going back with some garbage bags and getting some mulch or chips for my flower beds. Look for those type of deals.
Once I was showered and dressed (knocking one of drips out of my hand in process and spilling blood EVERYWHERE), I walked to a chair and had my first go at feeding Amber properly and unassisted since she was born. This combined with the shower and I was a new person. Amazing how the little things like being able to leave your bed and look after your new baby for yourself and make things so much better.
Now, I've just confirmed for every one, I really am crazy.
Lately I've been bemoaning the slim pickings at the Goodwill "bins", my favorite go-to place for "stuff". I come home with a few odds and ends each time, but nothing unique that really inspires me to create.
nerving
“BP’s policies are as rusty as its pipelines. I’m even more concerned about BP’s corporate culture of seeming indifference to safety and environmental issues. And this comes from a company that prides itself in their ads on protecting the environment. Shame. Shame. Shame.” Rep. Joe Barton, R-Texas, told BP executives during a heated September 2006 hearing, Welch reported.
Here we have the closest situation that I have experienced of the European beaches that are tolerant of nudity and these "people" are putting it at risk.
Hannah is very shaken by this revelation and goes on a road trip with her best friend Jason and his friends seeking answers to her past. She is also struggling to handle the feelings this revelation has drudged up.
A tamis
and a little old fashioned elbow grease.
Working out is about all I do for fun (?) these days. I have been doing step aerobics a couple times a week, and pilates 4 times a week, though one of my teachers just quit so now I am screwed. I have also been doing Pilates reformer classes here and there, and Cross Fit, which I ADORE!!! I actually have bruises on my arms where the 45 pound bar hits me, and my legs were so weak from air squats today, I could barely do step class! More please
The quote above by Picasso suggests two things to me: first, that art which is too closely tied to myopic current trends will not have lasting value, it will fail to “live always in the present”; second, that temporal distance is not a determining factor for whether a work continues to have resonance.
Not too long ago, I had the privilege of meeting an 87-year-old lady we'll call "Polly Pilly" at a hospital I work at a few hours a week. I know this name sounds REALLY made up, but, I'm telling you, it is VERY, very close to her real name. Just seeing her name on the medical chart made me want to run in and see what her face looked like. I was tripping over people's rolling IV poles in the hallway trying to get in her room as quickly as possible.
Here are a few snapshots of her graduation day :)
That's my overwhelming impression of what should be Nepal's equivalent of the "Kids From Fame" high school. Lalit Kala ("Fine Arts") is a secondary school where classical music, singing, and fine (visual) arts are taught. The building is historic; several generations of Nepali royal court musicians used to house and practice there. But it's terribly dilapidated; the semi-modern toilet installed smack in the middle of the ground floor is only the beginning.
- She loves to play with her little kitchen and cooking stuff and draw on her easel. She asks us to go upstairs to play with her all the time.
Anyway, so it’s noon, and I’m about to enjoy the sort of odd lunch that I’ve assembled from 7-Eleven. I go to the bathroom and BOOM! Red blood. Rather a lot of it. Part of me is like, fuuuuuuuuuuck. And part of me is like, well, at least if this had to happen, it’s excellent timing! At least I don’t have to go to the ER again.
smoked salmon
words that had scrolled itself into knots of indecipherable tangles
Now before anyone get into a twist about this, I am glad he told me. We have such open communication where we are right now, that I don’t want Dave to censor anything he feels he needs to share with me. Afterward he held me as I cried a bit, was probably shocked more than anything else, about what I’d just heard, reminding me that he never acted on his thoughts, assuring me that he was still here and that he wasn’t going anywhere. He loves me and loves the life we have now, and said he’s thankful that he was right about the beautiful woman he knew was underneath all the garbage, was now showing herself
Anyway, since then we had to wait until the area dried out so the next stage could begin. Here's the first load of fill that arrived last weekend. Now that pile is only half the size it was when the whole load first arrived. By the time I'd taken this shot, darling husband had already spread almost half of it. It's amazing just how much fill is needed for a job like this.
Barsoom also hosts a race of four-armed white gorillas, a funhouse reflection of those trod-worshipping slaves freed after the Captain’s Confederacy lost its War Between the States. There’s even a human-looking race of a once great but now tragically fallen civilization. Burroughs doesn’t describe any antebellum mansions in the ruins, but a 1912 reader would have recognized the vanquished South in Barsoom’s dusty riverbeds.
I don't need another place for always wearing smiles, even when it's not the way I feel,
A. When I was a child I remember struggling with loving God, not the concept of loving God, but the practicality of loving Him. I wanted to feel love towards God, but I just didn’t. My mother gave me this piece of advice, pray for it, ask God to fill you with His love so you can love Him.
Added this week: 8 yards
But the weather is gorgeous and the kids still want to be out doing stuff, so today we decided to go on our first family hike of the year. I had seen one I was keen to try on the excellent Mums and Tots Out and About Blog, so we set off for Lichtenstein after breakfast.
In 1977, a mysterious discovery was made on the floor of the Atlantic concerning an unknown technology. A 650-foot pyramid was mysteriously lit up, with sparkling white water surrounding it that turned deep green, a shocking contrast to the dark black waters at that depth. The discovery was photographed by Arl Marahall’s expedition off Cay Sal.
Janie xxx
“What does it ask?”
* Remove one disk from the fridge, and roll it either between two sheets of parchment paper, or just well-floured surface. You need to move quickly though. You don't want the dough to be soft and overworked.
Thankfully Sunday was much calmer.
1 history
As I said before, you do not need to have a fancy web site to get booked. It's nice to have it because you can compile all your work in one place. But it's expensive to have a good web site that represents your style and aesthetic properly. It almost always mean you need to work with a good art director who can truly reflect your sensibility online. My background is in digital media. I've spent all my 13 years in NYC working as an art director in major advertising agencies. I design everything from logos (my least favorite), to full blown out web sites, Facebook applications, iPhone/iPad apps, to banner ads. The cost of having a web site is NOT cheap. Many people have asked me if I would be interested in designing their burlesque sites. It is not that I am not interested in helping but I know what burlesque performers can afford, and $200-800 is not going to get you a good web site. Especially since once the site is up, you have no way to update it on your own.
Thank you Squawk for the eggs you gave us. May your next life be a better one.
CIA Director Propaganda: Cyber attack could be next “Pearl Harbor” City of San Francisco Says Its Toxic Sludge is Good for You Fomenting Armageddon: Jerusalem’s Colonization and Western Apathy Watch: Ultra Zionists Take Manhattan, and Demand the Holy LandSpeakers at an extremist rally lash out at Jewish groups and Dem politicians, warn that cozying up to Obama would endanger Israel and imperil the settlement enterprise. Proposal: All New Yorkers Become Organ Donors $50-$60 Billion Laundered from US nonprofits into illegal West Bank colonies creates threat of terrorism backlash No Wonder Christians Are Lost How the Western Media Promotes a Mistaken View of the World
apart
Philippians 3:20
What the hell is wrong with me,
It was a house, a farmhouse, up on the hilltop. Under the meagre shelter of its porch, we hammered on the door, but there was no reply. The light in the window had faded out once we were in sight of the house.
I was reading the Met Office (UK) blog today and a guest blogger gave this valuable warning
It goes without saying that an increase in the debt ceiling would also accompany the bill.
UPDATE : I should point out here that I mean no offence with the title of this post to an oppressed race that has suffered hundreds of years of violence, death, oppression and degradation because of prejudice and racial hatred.
May 2, 2012 – LOS ANGELES, CA – An ongoing swarm of small earthquakes is rattling homes and nerves in the Inland Empire. Over the weekend, there were a handful of new quakes near Devore, Idyllwild and Indio…LINK
Driving is quicker.
My Dad has calls me the Mamarazzi. When he sees me walking towards him and Noah with my camera, he’ll say “Noah, here comes the mamarazzi!”
15. “You Know What I Mean” by Cults
Thank you SO MUCH, friends at Boulevard. The Big Stout was awesome, and I am so happy to hear that you all are working on new artisan beers to add to the Smokestack Series over time. It was cool to be included in that process, even to a small degree.
Now that I am writing about this, it seems that there was a commonality in the books that I liked the most. In Mog, the Forgetful Cat (yet another yard sale find) the family cat is constantly berated by the family for being so forgetful and lazy. My favorite part was when Mog would meow to be let outside and then immediately, he would turn around and meow to come back in again. He'd forgotten that he'd wanted to go outside in the first place.
How to recap the past 10 days? From the beginning, I suppose.
Between being pregnant and now the aftermath of rape, I walked around in a fugue state for awhile, doing all sorts of flat out crazy shit not the least of which was holding onto this relationship with this guy because if we were still dating, I can't possibly have been raped. I wouldn't date a rapist. Ergo...it's an excellent example of rationalization and circular thinking, don't you agree? I was a ping pong ball, reacting to this and to that but never once stopping to think about what I was doing or why I was doing it. It was almost like a state of mania.
22. Patricia de Lille, politician (1951 - )
I’m repeatedly amazed at the infatuation with ‘growth’ economies. If we’re not talking about our own growth, we’re talking about someone else’s and how we can get our share of that market so that their growth becomes our growth.
Disturbingly, despite the ridiculously low sentence, it was alluded to that Yildirim may have previously abused his position to force young girls into sex:
8) Her Majesty took a dump in the bath tonight. (No pictures, I promise.)
Radon can also be dissolved in ground water and can be introduced into the indoor air through the aeration of well water during its use in washing machines, showers, etc. . .
Matt: "Awesome!"
TPOH are best known for their late eighties hit I'm an adult now, which I hated with a passion at the time - I was going through my "everything in the charts is crap" phase! I got my comeuppance a few years later - what I was listening to at the time (grunge) became mainstream (sigh)! Also, I felt I'm an adult now was championed by people who wouldn't know a good tune if it bit them on the arse!
2. Add all remaining ingredients and mix well. Cover and refrigerate for at least one hour.
“I am calm, I’m just confused.”
Casey Anthony, the murderer of her young daughter (Yes she murdered her daughter, I said it so what), then they have the Trayvon Martin case who was murdered in cold-blood by a wanna be cop (George Zimmerman) who is using the most insanely idiotic law of self-preservation I have ever heard (Stand your ground) and now an illegal immigrant, Jose Manuel Godinez-Samperio, mind you whom is breaking the law, is fighting to become a lawyer in the United States.
God created the garden, which contained both the Tree of Life and Tree of Knowledge of Good and Evil (2:8-9).
No P.O. Boxes.
HA! Punny, I am!
“The latest version of the Android app. and the beta versions of our Mac and Windows desktop applications includes a new way to put all the photos and videos you take in your Dropbox called Camera Upload,” according to the Dropbox Help Center.
The point being: yes, women have the freedom of choice now, but we are living in a sexual world unlike anything ever seen before in human history. Women have never been as sexually free as they are now; there is something new under the sun. It has been virtually physically impossible for women through most of human history to live, much less reproduce and raise children, without the protection of men and the sustenance provided by them.
The lunch counter. Where you will be surrounded by chow-downers. Employees who only have an hour and their spouses work across town and so they — like you — will be alone.
I stamped and heat-embossed this lovely Easter bunny angel by artist Joanne West,
You didn't know the homeless man was Me!
*Promise of spending time at Hobby Lobby
Exploration of the chapel in the wake of the battle reveals holy water and a wand of cure light wounds, which Callimachi pounces on immediately. Initial appraisal suggests nothing about how much efficacy the wand has left to offer, so Callimachi immediately expends a charge on himself, just to be sure it still works.
Hands can do incredible things, but nothing compares to using them to help save a life. The new website, www.handsonlycpr.org, provides additional information and resources on the technique.
Last year, the City of El Paso held public meetings regarding the fate of the old American Smelting and Refining Company (ASARCO) smelter. City Council later passed a resolution to burn marijuana in the giant incinerator within the smelter using the old smokestack as a literal "superjoint.
But here's the thing: The American Dream goes against everything I personally believe in. I want to be an open, loving person who isn't just seeking to further myself or my agenda.
Ireland shall get her freedom and you still break stone.
Hi Cynthia:
We chose number 2. We had to reconfigure the whole area and have turned the hutches to the side so they'll work.
Q1611 Mr Farrelly: Let us just go to Operation Motorman then and payments to Stephen Whittamore. Were you aware of any relationship between the News of the World and Stephen Whittamore?
* Image - Mo Manning 'Hanging Stockings'
Secret #1 – Choosing the Right Product to Promote
before the 'signing of the books' ritual in the signing tent. All those who hadn't asked their questions came up and did so. Very chatty they were too. I had a photo opportunity with the nice kids from Strathyre in the Trossachs who'd come a long way and very nearly not made it. And then...then I had tea in the yurt with the Bookwitch and her lovely daughter, Helen. The Bookwitch writes a pretty fabulous blog, so the next day I was flattered to feature in it along with my lucky red coat. She was even polite about my talk.
And, my last Random for the day: I heard another song by Carrie Underwood called "Don't Forget To Remember Me"...Love this song, it makes me attempt to think about the day my girls will leave home and go off to college when their around age 18-Let the tears start flowing, mama's. I love the lyrics to this song.
and this blog is the magical place
You once said you were obsessed with three things: sex, death and life. How do those obsessions hold true today?
What can I say? Jane Austen and P. D. James in one are just too much temptation! I don’t know if there is ever a bad time to read mysteries, but Christmas always strikes me as the perfect time to curl up with a whodunnit. Country house mysteries are a particular favourite. Seriously can’t wait to get my mitts on this one. I trust P.D. James to do a good job of revisiting Pemberley. I went through a comfort reading phase about 10 years ago when I read “sequels” to Jane Austen’s novels. They did not give me comfort, but I kept reading them, thinking, eventually someone has got to get it right. Hoping this is the someone.
-”You look weird .Your hair,your appetite for food,You didn’t talk to him or them at all as you always do.
Threw them into a dish with some sugar
Susannah Rickards (UK) – Hot Kitchen Snow
The same tone was taken by Defence Minister Ahmad Zahid Hamidi who said he would not attend the Scorpene probe, and that Putrajaya would be sending any representatives either.
And brought them into the kitchen where I placed them carefully on the kitchen table.
I've started working out again. I'm doing Leslie Sansone. Much to my chagrin, I can do about a quarter what I was doing the last time I did it. Why does fitness go away so quickly? During August, I rode 60 miles a week on my bike, now I'm doing one mile to a DVD. *SIGH* Well, I'm going to do a Fitness Boot Camp of my own design. This week I'll walk a mile a day, next week two miles and so on. I figure I'm starting out slow enough that I won't really need a day off. Walking isn't too hardcore anyway. I have four miles of Leslie, so in a month, I should be ready to branch out to some other DVDs.
Yes, I had more than a small interest in shooting this deal down but by this time I was near mental collapse and just wanted this torture over and done. Luckily, for me the Carfax report showed over twice the listed mileage the owner stated and a couple of accidents he completely forgot to tell us about, which shot down the deal. Spoilboy had jumped the gun a little and had already arranged a meeting with this person at a halfway point between our respective locations. Upon reading the Carfax report for some reason neither Dragonwife, Spoilboy nor myself remember to call this guy back and cancel the meeting. Ooops, I hope the shit did not wait very long at the Applebees we were supposed to meet.
Paenther’s pride demands revenge against the enchantress who emerged from the deep woods like a sensual vision and enthralled him, even as she makes his body burn with passion. Despite his fury over her treachery, Skye’s gentle beauty calls to his soul, calming the wild chaos within him, and stealing his heart. But when evil threatens, Paenther and Skye’s only chance at survival is to trust in one another . . . and the power of love.
7. Gotta add seeing Ian Hunter in concert to my bucket list.
1. What are you reading? Likewise, to whom do you listen, what movies do you watch, what sports teams do you follow, cooking shows, etc. Basically: what’s the input that leads to your output (not to try and decipher yr music through that stuff, at all, just out of curiousity)?
I got a worthless degree in Broadcast Journalism. While most of the classes I took were a complete waste of my time, money and mind, there were a couple that I found pretty interesting. One of those was a basic video production class.
The Calibamamom
The blast on Sunday was in a working-class area of the city, police and Kenya Red Cross officials said.
Isis was a little surprised by Rayna’s choice of words. She had her pegged as the good ol’ country bumpkin. Apparently, she was wrong. There was a lot more to Rayna than a sweet smile and polite conversation.
I still believe in the male gaze. Seems like everyone has given up on that.
If you like gardens and nature, then I'm sure you'll enjoy Elisa's blog. Today, she is hosting her very first Nature Walk Garden Party, which will be held every Thursday, come rain or shine.
.....it was very difficult to find something
For years they were the only flip flop that could pass for both a pool shoe and work/wedding appropriate. That making packing for summer trips a breeze.
Elder Baxtor also mentions his mother, who demonstrated resilience while raising him alone. Likewise, we should all demonstrate resilience during our tough times.
Don’t get me wrong, Auburn’s number is certainly above average. It’s not like the Tigers were awful, of course. But you’d expect a team that went undefeated through the nation’s toughest football conference regular season, won the SECCG and capped the season by winning the BCS title game to have stood out a little more strongly. As it turned out, Auburn didn’t even have the best SDPI in the conference.
So is Austin going to school in Savannah or Sarasota when he graduates? Awesomeness.
Our other demo person and fabulous Copic Certification instructor is Sally Lynn MacDonald. Here she is coloring some fairies and demoing basic marker tecniques to some very nice stores who are curious about the markers.
Source: Soompi
Our heroine X is in Cuba this week, but what's all this about lonely cocktails and being stood up? Just who was this Latin lover and why did he leave her in the lurch? Are those tear or mojito stains? More importantly, what will Y make of all these goings on. I get the feeling he was getting rather proprietary over this lady, despite them still carrying the vestiges of the stranger label about their persons. I really think he was expecting her in Barry last weekend...
People at the race couldn’t help but notice the Trail Nerds. We are now a Tribal Movement to be reckoned with! We’re like a well-meaning virus, spreading our message of camaraderie and infecting others with our fun-loving spirit.
Last week when I first got home from the US, I tweeted this pic of my newly acquired Revlon Nail Enamels which bear more than a striking resemblance to their cousins from Deborah Lippmann.
Hodge said he has rules in place to ensure Fawlty Towers is a non-threatening, not a place for sexual perversions. Swingers, or talk of it, is banned. So is sexually provocative clothing and cameras.
size of the trunks of the olive trees. That shows how old they are.)
2. Rummage Sale digging. There have been two church rummage sales in the last week. Even though I swear that I don’t need a thing it’s still fun to dig around in those piles and find a hidden treasure. Today it was a cute little poppy pin.
Judd Hamilton as Elle/Jiakta
Looking back on some of the more interesting projects I've worked on over the years, it is clear that passion drives the best ones. We love the stories of those who have pursued a dream, built something grand, or cured some dreaded disease. Would it surprise you to know that Heavenly Zeal stands firmly behind so much Earthly progress?
While it has been quite a busy wedding season, we've also been working behind the scenes developing a brand new look for the Laura Hooper Calligraphy website and A Lucky Orchid Wedding blog! On our new site you will find more invitation suites, more maps, more event signage and more information on all the the Laura Hooper Calligraphy specialties!
(honeysuckle in bloom 11/26 Brooklyn)
“I proudly offer this award to the people of my country, the people who respect all cultures and civilizations,” he added.
Reliance Broadc
Here's a preview of my Shutterfly cards - I love them!
About Buying — did not find the insufficient high-rise Ed Sturdy handbags, because while shopping online, but clients may find the best look to find that they want might be difficult — particularly if there is a unique style in mind and on colour. These types of retailers have a variety of styles of shoes, however without them (that I can find) actually transporting all the different looks available in one location or even from a single page. Thankfully, you have the possibility to guide customers how to locate the best color and style of a few useful buying web page they want, and discover that special style skills within on the internet. This can be a way to save time (money), when shopping Ed Sturdy purses whenever high-level ladies footwear.
Wow, that was fast.
#4 MsChif- 2009 MWR Female of the Year
and it’s stopping at your face.
We had started our retreat by driving through rural N.C. to arrive at Keith Clement’s Farm. Mr. Clement welcomed us with warm hospitality and helped start our amazing youth retreat. After setting up tents and taking a nature hike, we all walked over to a hillock overlooking a vast field. We stood up there together singing, praying, reading, and having fun. We read many passages such as Psalm 134-135 & John 16:1-15, which were very inspiring, until the sun was finally engulfed by the horizon. We walked back to the camp and finished up with cooking hotdogs and playing Grog (a very fun, yet terrifying game).
Note: Check that mother out!! That was number 1….number 2 and 3 did not make an appearance for the camera.
Heat up some olive oil and fry the onions and garlic till fragrant. Add in the fresh herbs, the tomato purée and tinned tomatoes, chilli, salt and pepper. Gently add the meat into the sauce. Cover and simmer while you prepare the white sauce.
he tried to involve himself in their activities,
In the room.
This is a fantastic book for anyone who wants to learn more about the emigrants’ experience at sea. There is a broader overview into how the emigrants were provided for, and the care taken by the emigration commissioners in ensuring the voyage was as safe as possible. The book also discusses the migration experience in different decades, pertinent with the changes to medicine as well as type of shipping. It is interspersed with extracts of letters and individual examples which illustrate the experiences.
I came “home” to a lot of hurt. Whether it was reality or realization of things I missed or wished I could still have in life doesn’t matter. What matters is God was pushing me to the edge of myself yet again. The pain kept rising to the surface until I felt like I wanted to vomit it up. Dissolved dreams, relationships I will never have, rejection, anger, loneliness, fear – there it was, staring me in the face, waiting for me to either run or stare right back into its beady eyes as a sign I’d finally dominated it. I did neither. I lost my composure and cried.
Hank: Promise me.
Mrs. Ulman...Mary Woronov
1. Stock up on food and drinks. I think a classy event like Nato requires classy food. So I think I will stock up on a few bottles of a nice Malbec from Argentina, various cheeses, flavorful crackers. That should tide us over in case my favorite restaurants and bars have their hands full dealing with various heads of state and accompanying posses.
I grow Tomatoes in my PT now and use raised beds hence why I turned 2 of the Tomato grower boxes into one space saving planter.
First, I hear R stirring. I can almost hear the contentedness of her slowly coming out of sleep, stretching out in the bed, realizing there are good smells coming from downstairs. A few minutes later, I hear her soft footsteps on the stairs. Her sleepy smile and bedhead are just too cute. She’s so excited about breakfast, about the boy’s good sleep, and about the day ahead of us. We leisurely eat and dress. Eventually, Bram begins to stir. I go to him and we have a nice morning nurse. R gets him changed and dressed for the day while I attend to the morning dishes and the laundry.
The sad young woman whispered the answer this time. Her voice was kind and musical, but drenched with pain. “To the end of the line.”
Take note how this SA firm admits selling its high-tech spy products only to governments that are recognised by the United Nations. Makes one wonder how FREE democracy really is, and how private our telephone calls are. If they can do this to the people of Libya, you can be 100 percent sure they’re doing it to the citizens of South Africa as well!
Who: Thad and Cathy's family
Submissions should be no longer than 475 words. Space in the book is limited and entries will be edited for readability. Authors can choose to remain anonymous or have a short biographical paragraph included with their submission. Only one submission per adult learner is allowed. Each author who is included will be invited to the Florida Literacy Conference and will also receive a free copy of the book.
State: Full and slight dehydrated
Speaking of feeling better about Dan and trying to feel better about winter in general, I have been trying to have one blooming plant in the house at all times, ever since Dan told me how much he enjoyed them. Over the months I've had deep pink, purple and red cyclamens; pink and yellow begonias; orange and pink kalanchoes; an Africa violet; a few orchids; and yellow and purple primroses (which did not last nearly long enough).
Finally, at 8pm, four hours after the alarm was raised we received the all clear. Standing to strech out cramped limbs, the children were gathered up first and helped down the steep slope. Men from the party positioned themselves at regular intervals to help people over the tree roots and rocky outcrops. The last thing anyone wanted was a broken ankle on the way down! I waited at the back to make sure that those less limber, or clad in non-rock climbing flip flops, made it safely to the bottom, where a teenage boy could be heard saying to his mum "I think a snake has just crawled up my leg..."
It's pouring rain again!?! Well, it had to happen. After such a lack of rain here all summer, we're getting it now, just like we did in the spring. Most of the brooks in the area are completely dry, and the reservoirs and big rivers are super low.
Engineering Ancient Egypt...Saturday and Sunday on More4
4 featurettes for Wes Anderson‘s (The Royal Tenenbaums, The Fantastic Mr Fox) new movie Moonrise Kingdom have hit the web. The movie, set on a fictional New Panzance island in 1965, finds two 12-year-olds, Sam (Jared Gilman) and Suzy (Kara Hayward), fall in love and run away together into the wilderness. With various authorities on their trail and a violent storm brewing the once peaceful island is turned upside down.
THE BEST EXOTIC MARIGOLD HOTEL (May 4) – A group of British senior citizens retire to a run down Indian hotel. Some of the biggest British film stars are in this film, including Judi Dench, Maggie Smith, and Tom Wilkinson.
I didn't fall at any stops, but I did have an awkward moment when I made a U-turn, freaked out for some reason, forgot I was clipped in on the right side and tipped over. I unclipped in time, so I didn't actually hit the ground, but I bruised my left shin up pretty badly with my pedal.
I’d live a life of torture
2.Strain the infused alcohol into a clean 1-quart glass jar through a cheesecloth-lined funnel. Squeeze any infused alcohol from the cheesecloth into the jar; reserve the solids. Strain the infused alcohol again through new cheesecloth into another clean jar to remove any remaining sediment. Cover the jar and set aside for 1 week.
“The 2011 edition of credit reward is an amplified edition where by 100 beneficaries emerged from the continents because even citizens of the non member countries of the commonwealth.”
Here are just a few of the things we have planned.
DBP, Formaldehyde, Toluene, or Parabens in their nail polishes. Don't know what those things are? Me neither, so why would I put them on my hands?! The idea of non-toxic nail polishes is gaining popularity and it's exciting to know that more companies are focusing on providing more natural products, butter London boasts that they were "the first company to sell non-toxic nail lacquer in the United States." Way to set an awesome trend!
December 16
"I Only Have Eyes for You" seems, through most of the running-time, to be an exceptionally weak "monster of the week," but the final exorcising confrontation was a masterstroke. The gender-swap surprised me, and it was startlingly cathartic to see Buffy pour those feelings out to Angel, especially considering how reprehensible those feelings had been made to seem leading up to that moment. Seeing Angel play the other part was fascinating, too, since it raises the question of how much the reenactment wasn't just taking him over, but tapping into something still deep within him. I also thought it was clever the way his vampiric immortality made him uniquely capable of completing the cycle with forgiveness, allowing the troubled spirit(s?) to pass on. Most importantly, this encounter laid some vital emotional groundwork for the two-part season finale.
This explains why I watched T.V., movies, played video games, and fiddled with toys all the time. If I was home, I needed to be in my room. Todd couldn’t play with my toys because he would likely destroy them. (He would also drool all over them and they would get super icky.) He was also much larger and stronger than me, so if he decided that he didn’t want me to be around him, he could physically dominate me. So, me alone in my room was the safest and most fun place I could spend my time.
In fact the situation is worse than the judge implied, Judge Jones understated the truth, for we in Europe have gone beyond the point where the truth is merely no defence against race hate charges, the truth itself is now the crime.
and not die. Sixty-three, she said, like a question of him.
good enough people who wore well.
I can’t speak too much to whether jewelry stores and florist shops and the like suffer. My guess is that fairgoers need to buy stuff for Mother’s Day and some, who wouldn’t otherwise be in town, will buy their gifts in town.
“The shape was really appealing to me. I usually work really small, and it seemed really challenging. I wanted to see if I could do it. And I like the SPCA,” Gothard said.
* Xanthic (n) - yellowish in color; having to do with the compound xanthine.
Well friend.....As you know I've been having tons of fun with my Project Life album but I'm also on this bead bracelet kick lately. A local friend of mine just opened up her little shop called MAC beads. She makes the most amazing bracelets. I am so happy for her. I pray that God will light her path through this wonderful new journey in her life.
A few days later we have house-guests. So we add Hurricane J (3) and Little Man C (8 months) to the mix. (Their parents are nearby) And then on Wednesday we add Miss A (3 years) and Mr. A (11 months) to the mix..and my! oh my!
Hope you're having a fabby week so far,
From the initial position, the arm sinks slightly lower and the palm of the hand turns 45 degrees with the thumb side of the palm towards the bottom. This is called catching the water and prepares for the pull. The pull movement follows a semicircle, with the elbow higher than the hand, and the hand pointing towards the body center and downward. The semicircle ends in front of the chest at the beginning of the ribcage.
What are your thoughts? Agree or disagree with Sex Work vs Prostitution? What should we call underage prostitution? Is it beneficial for articles like these to be printed or are they more detrimental? Let me know…
I want to rescue them all, all the broken hearted kids and love them up and show them how special and wonderful they are.
No more than 25 yards away, a group of four men listened carefully as the Chinese commanders shouted at their troops. All four were virtually invisible, blending with the undergrowth of the swamp floor. One of the four men had been a Chinese linguist prior to the crash. He spoke both Mandarin and Cantonese fluently. The man’s whispered translation of the shouted commands was all the other three needed to help them decide to immediately return to their cabin deeper in the swamp.
In only its second week of opening, word has spread quickly. There's a quirky mix of Spanish grandmothers hovering among the army of business suits that troop in at lunchtime. We pull up a stool around a huge wine barrel and kick things off with a robust Colombian coffee while we nibble on a plate of green olives stuffed with walnuts and haloumi cheese.
So, this was our set up for the stage... the 40 or so white candlesticks, interspersed with four barrel vases of the tissue paper flowers. Most of my photos from that morning were terrible, but this one shows a view from the side, just before the service started.
The Fish have struck once again.
Just click on the image to go to the download site and follow the instructions there. In the download you will find a coloured (lol) Panda in both png and jpg formats, a jpg Panda Digi Stamp, a coloured Bamboo Frame in both png and jpg formats and also a jpg Digi Stamp Bamboo Frame as well. As an added bonus, there is a Bamboo backing paper included, so the whole download matches and hopefully you will enjoy crafting with this freebie.
Sri Sri Ravi Shankar: Yes, it is there in the Upanishads that earlier there was only Paramatma and He felt that He was alone, and He wanted to become many, so He became many. The intention happened on its own ‘ekoham bahusyama’. Sankalpa is not a deviation. It is not considered as a deviation. When a seeker (sadhak) transcends from the small mind to the Big Mind, then he considers sankalpa as a hindrance. But from the point of view of the Big Mind, it is a step to go further. So if you think why did sankalpa arise in the Paramatma, He should remain unwavering (nirvikalpa) – this is not so. Sankalpa is also Paramatma, nirvikalpa is also Him and vikalpa is also Him. Like in an ocean, waves arise on their own, in Paramatma, a thought arose to become many, so He became many. Different types of nature, different types of people and different types of intelligence were created.
I'm a HUGE YF fan - it's my number three favorite movie of all time- so I was really looking forward to this. I thought they did a great job overall - and I was really impressed with the way the three main actors : Victor, Elizabeth, the Monster - managed to make the parts their own. Of course all the iconic lines are still there - but just like Spamalot, I felt that the best parts weren't with the lines you already knew - but with the songs and the new material that the actors had to work with.
Lana was to toxic and was surrounded with to much Drama all the time. They spent more time trying to protect their relationship than actually having one. Plus Lex was always somewhere in the picture. I was glad when they finally took her out of the picture.
well as emergency response
6. Don’t do it alone!
She walked into the infirmary where those still stricken with the spell from the crash rested; they were in the back, while any other injuries were addressed in the front. The Priests on duty gave her nod; she was a familiar visitor there.
Rick Perez with the Texas Association of Tejano Artists claims that Norteño music is turning people away from Tejano music. “We used to have everyone listening to our music. Everyone. You know, first they come and take our jobs. Now they’re taking our music. What is this? We were here first.” When asked if anti-immigrant sentiment played a role in this issue, Perez became defensive, “Hey, I’m not a wetback. I was born and raised in Texas. This is the home of Selena.”
I recall all of that.
The screen saver slides into action when the mouse is left idle and my head is drooped down reading something on paper. I look up and instantly get lost in a fog of nostalgia at old holiday snaps, images of a baby Sapphire surrounded by ancient Tupperware lids floating in the bath, Love Chunks holding up a freshly caught fish at Victor Harbor and dinner parties long past. Who stole the rose out of my bridesmaid's bouquet and stuck it in their.... and then photographed it.....??
Is it still incitement to violence if no actual violence was committed? Have you been slandered if no reasonable person could believe the claims?
The locations are breathtakingly beautiful. Landscape fetishists should take great joy in Troll Hunter. It's certainly better than crappy old New York in Cloverfield. And then the Trolls appear, and that's incredible too. They look too unreal to ever be scary (like something out of that old PS2 game that nobody played), but there's a fairytale quality to the dodgy CGI that somehow befits the film. You won't quite believe it when you see it, but you'll really want to.
A charitable person might suggest that Prof. Edwards, having so massively misjudged the lacrosse case, has become unusually sensitive in its aftermath to violations of due process. A more cynical observer might conclude that Prof. Edwards’ concern with due process depends solely on the race, gender, or sexual orientation of the affected parties.
Remove from the oven and sprinkle with red jimmies. Invert one chocolate chip in the center of each disk. Cool in your fridge or cold garage for 20 minutes and they will remain hard until ready to eat. They keep well for a week in a sealed container.
The report is the first installment of a larger DOE project to assess the life-cycle environmental and resource costs of different lighting technologies. It looks at the manufacturing, transportation, use, and disposal of the products.The report says that the average life-cycle energy consumption of LED lamps and CFLs is similar, and is about one-fourth the consumption of incandescent lamps (see chart). But if LED lamps meet their performance targets by 2015, their life-cycle energy use is expected to decrease by approximately one-half.
What an amazing weekend! Just to start I would like to thank all those who helped me achieve my goal of hosting an Art Event! It was amazing!!! My partners in fun & creativity~ Mom (Kathy) and Lexi! They sewed, mod podged & gathered supplies like crazy for me! The teachers~ Kathy, Lexi & Mendy were fabulous!! Mendy drove in from Houston for us!! The guests~ Julie, Kristi, Katherine, Kelli, Laurie & Tammy were wonderful! The Aledo Bake Shop was so welcoming, helpful and yummy! The local shops were great to provide goodies for our Welcome Bags~ Forte', Fal de Ral & Urban West... so spectacular!
We arrived in Afton late on a Friday evening, and after a few cups of coffee and conversation with the grandparents, we decided to turn in. Laying awake in bed talking, not quite able to sleep just yet, our conversation turned to the old farmhouse that stood about fifty yards off the south side of the house. This was my first visit here, and I was as much enticed by the farmhouse's seemingly ancient, decrepit beauty as I was impressed by its subtle yet unmistakable air of foreboding. I mentioned to Jane how creepy it had looked to me under the light of the full moon as we approached the house, and how perfect a setting it seemed for the types of hauntings I was ever so fond of reading about on dark wintry nights. I asked her what it was like inside. She responded by telling me she didn't know, she had never been inside. I found this strange, what with my wife's seemingly voracious appetite for all things frightening, not to mention the inner fortitude she'd always displayed in braving cemeteries at night armed only with flashlight, tape recorder, and loaded Nikon. Her answer was simple: "Grandpa's never let me inside. He's afraid the roof might cave in on me." With that, my curiosity was assuaged. But at breakfast the next morning, the germ of a notion that I'd planted in her head was alive and kicking and she broached the subject with her grandfather.
If you could live your life again, what would you do more/less of?
obligation freely, without any mental reservation or purpose
But Thieves’ World stuck in my mind growing up… a LOT. Though it was hard to get a hold of the “final” book(s).
Oh and I cant forget to mention that as I was doing a bible reading with bub on hip(she would not co-operate and stay sitting with her aunty) she sneezed right in the middle of it which caused quite a reaction from the guests-FUN!
There is also some Stickles stardust on his hat and scarf.
we'll never see the past
you know, right off the bat, that whoever made these are no dummies.
Now the second part of the excitement:
2) Be enthusiastic and grateful for your ability to change. In fact, live your life as if the change has already occurred. Fill your mine with only the positive possibilities…both day and night. You will grow stronger in your resolve to live the lifestyle of your dreams.
Chestnut soup with porcini mushrooms, maple glazed onions & sage croutons with Boulevard Nutcracker Ale - 5.9% ABV.
Now, let me clear about something; that definition is not all bad. I am not suggesting that goals and objectives are inherently evil; far from it, as there are few things in the world that would be as good as they are unless someone had set a goal or objective to get something done. Without goals and objectives, our National Parks System would not exist, man would have never set foot on the Moon, and we never would have discovered a vaccine for polio.
Corey: You want a fanny pack for what?
Colours burst across the inside of the bubble, grey, black, yellow, orange, green, spreading out into vague shapes and starting to resolve into focus. A huge, dark space, a ledge overlooking a chasm, underground somewhere. Tall, narrow patches of colour that had to be brightly-clad people. Sweat rolled down Van Raighan’s brow. The Gift must be weak indeed in him.
Pan fry steaks till done to your liking.
the DT work really hard to try to comment on all entries but we are having a few problems with blogger at the moment, I am sure you are all aware of it, so please be assured that every entry will be included in the prize draw :-) Good Luck to ALL :-)
Salad greens, asparagus, cucumber, red onion, red chili, beef, soy sauce, citron tea, sesame oil, apple cider vinegar, and sesame seeds.
One cat was very old and arthritic. She had a lot and fire left in her though and let us know she didn't appreciate us. That makes it harder. I don't like to have and animal's last moment be like that.
*Note: Your boss probably won’t thank you for it and you might have to talk with the folks in human resources.
Truth is, I ran out of things to say. Re-hashing my day with BB was losing its appeal. As he does better, which is what we hoped and prayed for, there were less autism-related issues to share. I also got tired of using my blog as a place to re-live irritations by sharing in the hopes that a) others could relate and maybe shed some insight on what to do, and b) maybe the irritations would stop happening.
There is a simpler way.
The sky is the limit with the options of flavors to add to your hummus. What do you add to your hummus? I can’t wait to hear about how you make yours! Hope you enjoy this recipe!
One church pastor admitted: 'At times, you do wonder how people make it. What they earn, and the cost of living, just don't tally.'
I stopped in at Belmont Station last night and had a pint of Southern Oregon Brewing's Porter. If you recall, this is the Medford brewery that opened late last year (nice article here). For those of us at points North, it is an obscure place. No presence on the web, and until I spied this beer, no distribution in Portland. And yet by all accounts, it's a fairly big brewery, so I've been hoping to see it eventually.
Our experience is always only one seamless, intimate totality. Only a subsequent thought appears to split it up into different categories of experience, such as mind, body and world, each made out of a different substance.
The extent of the international demonizing of white South Africa is further illustrated by the following statistics. A study conducted in 1977 revealed that the five primary news outlets in the United Sates; the New York Times, Washington Post, CBS, NBC, and ABC - while running among them only a single story on North Korea, seven on Cuba, and sixteen on Cambodia and its Khmer Rouge - ran a monstrous 513 stories condemning South Africa during 1976!
Or running through a sequence
Next let us think from the common man’s point of view. Independence was something tangible that everyone could understand and relate to. But is Lok Pal such a cause? It is not at all clear how exactly a Lok Pal bill will improve the life of the common man. Even educated people have doubts about its effectiveness. And there are people who question whether corruption is the biggest evil plaguing the nation. When public anger against corruption was at its peak, any movement related to corruption seemed like an ideal rallying point. Now with the passage of time and cooling of tempers, can it still be such a powerful rallying point? Can people feel passionately about Lok Pal the way they felt about independence?
Pause a moment, and step inside the head of Malcolm X. You’ll straightaway find the answer.
Thank God I bought those gritty sequined ballet flats and that gritty red houndstooth coat with three-quarter sleeves OH MY GOD THEY'RE GONNA LAUGH ME RIGHT OUT OF SEATTLE,
This disorder afflicts many American adults and is often misunderstood. The following resources help those investigating this disorder and provide resources for those who are currently affected.
Maybe, I HOPE, that thanks to the Internet, kids will have a place to go to ask for help. My partner would have LOVED to communicate with another kid who had a disease whom she could relate to. I would have loved to email a kid who shared my darkest thoughts. Together, maybe we wouldn't feel alone with out struggles. Feeling alone is the worst part of being bullied.
- Oleg gets serious about Sophie
Take the old string out, push the ribbon through, and make a couple of knots on top of each other at the back.
Nice to hear the odd one getting their come uppence
The Telegraph reporter was duly amazed and said "The odds of it happening are said to be 48 million to one"
"Sometimes they do this all at the same time, which is awesome."
Woodinville, WA 98072
This was also the book where I first read in detail about Napoleon and his strategy on war. It is brilliantly portrayed in the book. The book is a sort of fictional history with very accurate historical events but at the same time the story is centered around some fictional characters. The events leading to the war, resilience of Russian people, the way they fight back makes this book a true epic. On one hand there is historical war and on the other hand there are simple dreams and aspirations of young people and how these two mix up with each other as the story moves forward is truly exceptional.
Quote from the book:
Happy True Easter to ALL!
All sets have been developed with a purpose to empower and inspire all quilters to create their own quilting patterns without any restrictions.
The relationship of conservatism to religion has been on my mind lately, sparked by posts such as this over at the SecularRight blog. Heather MacDonald typifies one sort of modern atheist, the kind that sees religious belief as obviously absurd. For her, the difference between Harold Camping (the force behind the recently unfulfilled prophecy of the apocalypse) and mainstream believers is trivial: It is only because Camping has made an empirically falsifiable prediction that he is distinguishable from mainstream believers at all.
Hiding.
Growing up, I knew very little of goals and objectives. To me, a "goal" seemed very clinical; it involved milestones and specific accomplishments, it was planned for in advance, and it is set in relative stone, all with a specific desired end state. Knowing me at the time, I probably looked it up in the dictionary and saw a definition kind of like this one:
No,no!
Hebrews 12: 1-3
And, still, I saw properties up and down the Atlantic coast of Florida with more than half of their units shuttered.
But, in a further complicated twist, that is exactly how some non-Pakistani Asians are using it - as a term of abuse.
I exercise to avoid feeling anxious._____
An Italian company, Dada & Co. Kids, applied to register a figurative mark which included the words "Dada & Co. kids" in Class 25 for "clothing, footwear, headgear". Munich (Germany) based Ifemy opposed, citing an earlier German word mark, DADA, registered for the same goods in the same class. Dada asked for proof of genuine use of the earlier mark, so Ifemy sent a fax to OHIM in Alicante (Spain) supplying a list of documents on which it sought to rely for proof of genuine use of its mark. The fax arrived on time, but the 202-page bundle of documents didn't. The Opposition Division and the Board of Appeal, dismissing the opposition, agreed that the documents were inadmissible since they arrived late. Ifemy then appealed to the General Court, which upheld the decisions of the lower instances.
3.) Autumn (Michael Soldan - Jeff Cannata) - 4:45
That formulation is a tautology, since it authorizes the use of any amount of force needed to extract the sample. As long as the police were reasonably careful in calibrating the duress the applied, they could continue escalating the level of force until it broke the suspect; wherever they end up would obviously be the "minimum" necessary to accomplish their
incoherent dumbass?
Here are some books that have stuck with me. I won't call them favorites, because I never do so well on choosing favorites. It's like choosing a favorite child or something. They come in roughly chronological order of my first encounter with them. Since I'm wordy, and a bit opinionated, I will let you in on what I like about each pick, too.
Any more ideas for me? I'd love to hear from you, if you are a Brownie camera lover! Apparently, there are quite a few of you out there. I hope I get some sweet, sweet shots tomorrow.
This cake was DE.LICIOUS!
sausage mixture down the center of dough. Bring dough over
Practice the “keeping going” part. You keep practicing it and the easier it gets.
So many promises were stacked
I participated in NaNoWriMo—that crazy, madcap month when anyone can become a novelist—for nine years running. Starting when my son was nine months old, corralled in a playpen beside the laptop, and continuing until he was in the third grade, I set aside every November to write a novel. I wrote through everything. I wrote while packing to move to Seattle. I wrote while temporarily living in a business hotel in Cincinnati. I wrote while recovering from swine flu-induced pneumonia. Last year, in what would have been my tenth anniversary with NaNoWriMo, I stopped.
I know hardly anything about serial writing, and so far have not featured much about it on this blog. So to help advertise Geri's book I asked her to write a guest post about serials. They're more of a challenge than short stories, obviously, but pay well and as Geri's found, you may be able to resell them in book format! Definitely worth a go!
They have appropriated this lovely park - which is named for a Naval hero - and trashed it. They've turned it into their own little slice of the Third World complete with Smell-O-Rama.
- When Marseille was bluffing, he would move his ears …
The information in this article is to be used for informational purposes. It should not be considered as, or used in conjunction with, professional medical advice. Consult your doctor prior to beginning any skin care regimen or if you have been diagnosed with any disorder involving the skin.
I’ll never forget the number of people I’d never met before some of whom had never voted before who shook my hand as I stood at the Polling Station in 2008 after we stopped sending people to that place.
Gough's Cave makes it pale in comparison.
May I take this second to express my hatred for Flag Ceremony?
Him: That I swear. Before us, it was 8 months, well, excluding my hands.
One of the chapters in my book is called, “Turn Off the News.” At the end it has some suggestions for how to get started going Free-Range, including, “Get up and go out. Spend that hour you were going to watch ‘Law and Order’ on a walk with the kids instead. Look around at all the unspeakable crimes not being committed. This is called the Real World. (Not to be confused with MTV’s version, which is a crime all its own.)”
(As I look at these photos it's interesting to me how my style and changed/updated/evolved since taking them.)
Have you used Polyfore to plan spaces? What has your experience been?
And when you get the chance, click that "JL America" tag right down there below to check out even more killer oddball Metal weirdos. HIGHLY recommended!
Chikako, a little older than me, experienced in using the sea’s surface as a launch pad for going beneath, was taken on without a trial.
Please click on the hyperlink on the sidebar (rainbow Michigan) to visit Brian Alexander's web page: The Pittmann/Puckett Documentary.
I got into another art show with my Valley print, this time The Print which is being held at the Ann Arbor Art Center! I'm really proud of this because it is a juried show open to any printmaking artist in Michigan. My print will be on sale too.....and I think if I did my math right after the entry fee and cost for supplies and framing, I'd earn a profit of about...uh...maybe $5. haha. But It's totally not about selling to me. I'm just stoked to be in the show!
mini wod:
Supplies: Stamp: Bugaboo; Paper: My Minds Eye; Copics: R59, R89, G40, G59, C7, YR18, B41, C1, R20, and Blender; Other: Paper Stuido Snowflake, PTI Buttons, SU Ribbon, Cuttlebug Folder, Nestabilities, Stickles, and Distressing.
They shall take up serpents; and if they drink any deadly thing, it shall not hurt them;
People respond to dialysis very differently, much of it due to the status of their overall health and related co-morbidities: for some it’s not too drastic, and they manage well with dialysis for years; for others, it can be extremely draining and dispiriting. Mama came home weary and discouraged from her first session, and her exhaustion only increased as the weeks passed. We could see her health fading, and our own spirits sank as well.
Thankfully it is not here yet. Time, E@L means. It will be here soon though, he is semi-reliably informed by the voices inside his head (they obviously have nowhere more pleasant to spend their holidays).
–no mounts. Not needed with waypoints.
I should add that even though there aren't any pictures ED worked just as hard cutting out the lapbook parts and making her own lapbook!
Aside from the magical land of Prince Poppycock exposure, the gender dynamics at school are becoming increasingly ... interesting. It still hasn't come up to any of my peers that I'm transgender, so I feel all weird inadvertently stealth. And when the topic of gender pops up in my classes, I have this urge to rant and ramble on and on with my tranny gender input - but, never quite sure how much to share that won't divert from the main focus of the class.
Well then, on to the next...:D
The heart buttons are from Joannes.
Angella Crockett
This year 13 million American kids will be bullied and three million students will be absent because they feel unsafe at school, according to the documentary Bully. Bully sheds light on the harmful mental health effects bullying can have and has inspired a national conversation about how parents and educators should deal with this nationwide crisis.
How about this?
Maternity clothes? Yep
Remember, remember, the 5th of November
Unfortunately, Topps limits the set to U.S. athletes only. And as you can see by the labeling, some may not even end up as Olympians. They are "hopefuls" right now. That's kind of stinky. But I think issuing the set before the Olympics is a little more appropriate than issuing it after the Olympics, when everyone knows who the athletes are but have probably moved onto something else.
See the turtles
I don’t know what the future is going to look like for South Africans. There will be change. With countries like America becoming socialist, they will no longer be able to preserve the world order. As much as that may seem like a good thing for South Africa, there may not be other nations or cultures willing to take up the fight for human rights again like western civilizations did. We know China does not have a good track record with human rights. And as the global economy collapses, my fight for survival is just as intense as the next guy’s. Faced with the prospect of an unnatural death, I don’t believe it is very admirable to surrender my soul to hysteria caused by self – doubt in war time.
The single most important understanding is that the scale tells no lies. While a girl might have an average ranking of 6 in her demographic, there will always be that somebody who sees her as a 9 or 10… and that is what matters.
‘Of course I do.’
Yeastie Beastie Rosemary Bread
I shook hands nervously, bumbling that there had been a bit of a mix up with the titles, but thanking her for giving me the commendation for 'Mother’s Love.’
I groomed and tacked Oliver, and we got ready to ride. Luckily, the rider before me was working on some of the same things I have been ("Get off your inside rein!", "If you ask incorrectly, it isn't his fault!" etc), so listening to the end of her lesson while we warmed up was a nice mental refresher on what we had been doing.
For those of you who, like me (until last night) were unaware, today is Dewey's 24 Readathon. I loved my last readathon experience (Dewey back in October), so I really wanted to join, but my lack of planning makes full participation impossible. Still, because I still want to be a part of it, I've got an update post going and hopefully I can spend lots of today reading (or what's left, I had to spend the morning doing errands).
Click the image for a download if you think you could use this form too.
But I’m talking about real, seriously fat people here. In other words, Obese people.
Great site you have here, I hope it gives people inspiration to want to leave a god forsaken country that is being run into the ground...
add 1 gallon + 6 cups cold water to your bucket and mix well. Set aside and let sit for 24 hours. Its chunky and gel like. This is normal.
When I was a kid, my family's VW wagon had holes in the floorboards. During the winter months my father would wrap his legs in a blanket and hop to get into the car. My mother would hand him a cup of coffee for his drive to work. I remember thinking he looked like a worm, not that he was uncool.
WHEREFORE, in view of the foregoing, respondent Dionisio D. Ramos is severely REPRIMANDED and warned that a repetition of the same overt act may warrant his suspension or disbarment from the practice of law.
yeah so last night.. dancing on a stage with a drink and my camera wasn't such a good idea. there's a great possibility that my beloved baby will never ever click its shutter again.
When he arrived in his country, it happened that Zinyemba became sick and Hundungu said to him, “You must go to the chief of the vaRozvi now to be given the chieftainship of Mangwende.” Zinyemba answered Hundungu saying, “I am sick, I shall go when I am well.” Then Hundungu went to the chief of the vaRozvi and said, “I have been chosen to be Chief Mangwende.” Chief of the vaRozvi agreed, and gave Hundungu some medicine called mayipe to eat. This medicine was given by the vaRozvi to new chiefs. When Hundungu returned to his country, he called all the sub-chiefs of vaNhohwe. When they were gathered together the drums were beaten. On that day all the vaNhohwe people were told that Hundungu was now Chief Mangwende.
Due to the episode focusing almost entirely on character introductions and the first football game of the season there isn’t much in the way of plot to discuss. Instead, I’d like to give my first impressions of each of the characters I feel are going to be important down the road:
Iron
For example: The EU is an economic unit although an imperfect one since not all members of the EU have adopted it current the Euro differences in tax rates and regulations across countries still remain and some markets such as the market for energy are still not fully deregulated.
And his mother and father never kissed
Zygons had a very deeply ingrained fear of fire.
Here it is, Saturday morning at 1:23a.m. and I should be asleep becuase I have to start the major house packing in the morning for the big move on the 7th January (one of my followers is also moving that day!).
This is a video where she does a Friday night makeover on a friend (while drinking a pint). This is a good video for seeing how to blend multiple colors, as well as smoking up your look for night. Also note the use of the aforementioned Avon Supershock Gel Liner.
Abodah Zarah 67b . "The vessels of Gentiles, do they not impart a worsened flavour to the food cooked in them?"
But, at the end of this year, the Advanced Talmudic Institute at MATAN will be shut down prematurely. Despite the personal obstacles this has created for us, our greater concern is the implication this has for the wider Jewish community.
Canine noir is so a genre – Dog On It is the first of a series of detective novels told from a dog’s point of view. I’m totally serious – Chet is our narrator, and while he may be unreliable (he’s a dog), he’s pretty observant and hugely entertaining. And reasonable forgetful. This book caught my eye thanks to a blurb from Stephen King, and just in time, as the fourth book in the series is out in October.
We have shared several times in the past days how Jesus is the Good Shepherd who will not let his sheep stray.
old-fashioned movies/humour
Chapter 8 - The Coast
Servings: This recipe should make sufficient topping for two 9x5 loaves (23cmx13cm) or 12 rolls. If you make only 6 rolls in the first soft white roll recipe, you can cut the topping recipe in half.
Accordingly, the most profound act of selfless devotion (commonly called love) in relationship to a society gripped by a sociopathic mode of being is creative resistance. Submission is madness. Sanity entails subversion. The heart insists on it; otherwise, life is only a slog to the graveyard; mouth, full of ashes; heart, a receptacle for dust.
The unknown road still marching.
Now, while you're here.. be sure to stop back in a couple of hours for the first Pinkette Preview Day of the BRAND NEW School Pinkettes. Don't miss it!!
Golden carpets swell
At the video, for banned from tv
Anyway, I ask to speak to someone else because this is the most ridiculous thing I've heard in a long time. All around the policy is what it is. No one can help, not even the folks listening to the conversation via social media (yes, their @MotoMobile Twitter account responded).
The morning beckon
Yes, I love living with the Captain.
It has a snooze button.
Then there’s also moer-maar Gaddafi -- accused of supporting CIA-backed terrorist networks throughout the world in the 1970’s and 1980’s. Charles Taylor was but one of the many CIA-sponsored criminal elements who passed through the terrorist training camps of the World Revolutionary Headquarters in Gaddafi’s Libya. Surely it cannot be mere coincidence when Taylor ended up Libya to be trained as a terrorist after ‘escaping’ from a United States prison? Thank goodness Taylor’s other ol’ buddy-terrorist, Nelson Mandela, didn’t have access to a saw, while HE was behind bars! ;-)
Huts were ablaze around me. Men, women, children, slumped on the ground, sometimes their faces cupped in the light of the fire, as it splashed the world orange, yellow, red.
Then, as he hunted for more victims, the entrapped would escape back up the stairs, still screaming and giggling.
Combine atta flour, baking powder, milk and apple juice in a bowl. Add pumpkin and mix until smooth. Heat a non-stick frying-pan over medium heat and brush with some melted butter. Drop level tablespoonfuls of the mixture into the pan and cook until bubbles appear on the surface. Turn over and cook other side for 1 minute or until golden.
So off we went with fingers still crossed. Got about 5km this time before it blew again. hhhmmmm.... made it to Yankalilla, had lunch while Tim bought some hose clamps and fixed the connection. Decided to bypass Second Valley and just head to Adelaide cos it was getting late and had taken us four hours to do 40km, even though the scenery was incredibly beautiful.
I also went to youtube and searched ‘yoga spine stretch’ videos, to add to my recovery arsenal. If I can’t go running this week, then by jove I’ll be doing easy yoga every day.
A cure for excessive sweating has been sought after by thousands, if not millions. Where do we most often turn without a second thought? Modern medicine – but can such provide us with an actual-factual cure for what ails us so? With all the advancements in the medical field today, what is it that modern medicine can do for such a seemingly uncomplicated ailment?
V. Reflections on Religion, the Divine, and the Constitution (Lexington Books, ……)
There we ate tacos, drank Mango Brutus (and once thought that Orange Julius was a cheap copycat) and wandered around Filbar's and Nova Fontana.
This summer I want to have a fun full summer but also slow down and get in the woods and relax, enjoy the sounds, smells and feel of trees and the environment of nature surrounding me. Slow down a little and enjoy the simple life.
Each day I love them more. And more. And more. And each day I hurt for them more deeply than the day before.
The following morning she could be seen leaning against the back wall, her knees up against her chest. Felicon Whisper watched her, knowing that she couldn't see him, also believing that she knew someone was observing. She just stared, but he could see the wheels turning. I'm watching you, watching me. It was going to be that sort of game. “Go in,” Whisper waved to his man at the door.
Because mass media is such a critical component of our cultural network, it’s therefore important that mass media considers the kind of world we want and should have when offering creative works to the public. This isn’t about censorship (the misunderstanding of which is a post in itself), but about doing the right thing, even if no-one’s forcing you to. It’s about privileged white folks voluntarily taking a step back and making room for people who have been struggling for representation. It’s about those privileged white people not insisting that their experiences are the end-all, be-all of artistic merit.
- 2 boxes Nature Valley bars
Kid describes this to Elkie as being in "a position we'd all like to see you in in a few weeks' time", a phrase loaded with double meaning. Elkie at least remembers what it's called, unlike some people, and accompanies it with a local radio DJ point at camera. Kid adds it's "week number two for week number one. Number one. Or something." Retake, surely? Video again, Smokie to end, and between Kid gets his own catchphrase wrong. "From me it's good love, have a great week". Goodbye and good love, Kid! *Goodbye* and good love! Tch.
Although ranchers and farmers across the state have had a rough spring with flooding, and are now scrambling to hay, taking time to enjoy the open road with new friends was enough to leave the ranch for the weekend.
Millsaps finished second in the season point standings and Dungey finished third.
I wish to thank the NaturalNews Facebook fans who conducted much of this research to help us find the truth behind the Institute of Medicine (www.Facebook.com/HealthRanger)
In other words a PCR assay capable of detecting very low copy number of VP62 gag cannot detect XMRV in a known clinically positive sample."
If you’re looking for extra tricks from your phone, the Galaxy Nexus might be what you’re looking for. Out of the three phones, the Nexus is the only device with Near Field Communication support, which allows you to make wireless payments (at a small, but growing list of retailers), as well as to beam contacts, websites, apps or maps to other NFC-enabled devices by just bringing the phones together and making them touch.
We would do well to gwon bach to the past, to remember, recover and restore the concepts of resourcefulness and reciprocity in our communities.
—Spin
The fireworks were not as stunning as originally planned due to the rain delay, as this pyrotechnic display would have lit up the twilight sky. Still, the fireworks bolstered the message of praise from the stage.
The thing is, if I’m cheerful
So, in my opinion, Blizzard favored one faction over the other. The developers liked the Alliance side more than the Horde and unconsciously favored them with game development. I do think they strived to equalize it. But as I no longer play I can not tell you if they succeeded.
Technology & Marketing Law Blog (Eric Goldman)
It is the closest thing I have ever had to a diary. While there is nothing personal written in them, they do say a lot about me. I’m on my third notebook now and it’s a permanent fixture in my handbag. I’m going to make a new feature post where I will scan some of my favourite pages and upload them.
Julie Prichard A purposeful mess.
Anyway, back off the soapbox and back to the nonsense. Some of the jobs we get are ridiculous or unnecessary, but we don’t seem to bat them away but just take on what I like to call ‘shit’.
However, that doesn't change what I believe.
And of course the shop is stocked to the rooftops with lots and lots and lots of gorgeous knick knacks and bits and pieces for your home....xxx
‘They’re at it again, Maggie!
1. Quietly and calmly open up your laptop case.
So many others: Les Enfants du Paradis, Scorsese's The Departed, Makaveyev's Swtchboard Operator, Scott's Kingdom of Heaven . . . Cinema at its best has a fundamentally Romantic attitude, as in Goethe or Wordsworth: the effort to reconcile science, perception and the heart that makes it the defining medium of the modern.
1 spans
I am trying to locate this outfit as my GURU suggested:
After sailing into Haro Strait, the wind came aft and we set the chute. We reached toward San Juan Island and then ran along it's western shore. We originally had planned to sail the longer, more conservative route through Boundary Pass, but when we passed Turn Pt on Stuart Island, the management started thinking about sailing the same route through the Gulf Islands that a lot of the lead boats were doing. Since we were at the bottom of the scoring sheet, a late decision finally prevailed and we headed east through Boundary Pass and into the Straits of Georgia.
The history lesson continues across the A29: a glimpse through the trees of what remains of Hardham Priory, an Augustinian Priory dating from c. 1250. The Grade I listed Refectory is now a farmhouse, possibly the oldest house in Sussex, and judging by the scaffolding and tarpaulin, undergoing restoration.
TOUCHDOWN COOGS. These boys are slicing and dicing through UCLA's defense. Looking like it may be a Saint Arnold time at half time. Thinking I'll clear out the cellar with some Winter Seasonal beers. 7:18 Second Quarter. Yookla 7, Houston 17.
Paper are from my stash, I don't know what from which brand,
www.llanerch-vineyard.co.uk
Are we at least clear on that?
Another great thing about Charlotte is the proximity to lakes. If you venture slightly north of the city, you'll arrive at Lake Norman. This pretty lake will always guarantee you a good time, and maybe even a few sightings of a Nascar driver's home.﻿
During our visit to North Carolina we visited waterfalls near Cherokee, North Carolina, at Deep Creek in the Smokies, in the Dupont State Forest in North Carolina. We also stopped by a couple more waterfalls on our way home.
The seconds was the characters. There are several beautifully flawed characters in this novel, and what makes them great is that not a single one of them is perfect. They all make mistakes and they all pay for them, but there is one character in particular whose story is so heart-rendingly poignant that it will leave you gasping. I'm not going to go into who or why, because to do so would be to ruin it for you all, but I will say that there was something so realistic, so authentic and so disturbingly believable about this character that I don't know if I've ever read a more compelling portrayal of a human being.
Obfuscated by envious shadows, his skin lounges against my own as he strokes my face. When I close my eyes, I ignore the darkened objects surrounding us and I can veritably feel him moving around my body, surveying me in the night, even though he surely can see nothing but ink, the same as I. I reach out towards him, but fingers clutch at my wrist and push it back down by my side as those frozen silk lips trace the passages and cliffs of my face again and a whisper carries to my ears from the cleft of my cheek, just as it dips to my neck, “Yes, Aasta?”
Because I drove the night shift, my cab became a moving confessional. Passengers climbed in, sat behind me in total anonymity, and told me about their lives. I encountered people whose lives amazed me, ennobled me, and made me laugh and weep.
Several dozen demonstrators have claimed that they were assaulted by groups of over 10 policemen at a time and visual evidence appears to back their claim but police also point to violence from rally-goers who also attacked a police car.
Although Saul Bellow was born in Canada, he was a naturalized US citizen when he won the Nobel for Literature in 1976. This connection is the closest brush Canada has had with the illustrious literary prize to date.
I was on the verge of collapse due to some health problem and was extremely depressed due to it all. Nothing seemed to take away my hidden fears and life came to a complete stand still. I knew all those who loved me were trying patiently to cope with my outbursts and continuous aches, pains and emotional problems. It was a trying experience for everyone.
If I make it in neutral fabric colours all the kids can use it (this is a very attractive point for me as I don't particularly feel like making four of the suckers).
Shag stood proud, laughing and barking!
and the grand prize of an original handmade art doll by Mo! (I want one of these, lol)
However, since the top management change that happened in March, there has been no communication from the company, he added.
Birds and the birds of the winged trees flying my name
I love the shape of the leaves – they’re like little hearts. They’re growing quite long so at the moment I have them trailing down the side of the kitchen cabinets, however the plan is to get some floating shelves put up. I’ll also need a shelf for my latest purchase today:
For years, it has affected my lifestyle and music choices (particularly my instrument choice which is the trombone). I drove myself to study the trombone so I can play the ever-famous James Bond theme. It opened my ears to jazz, soul, big band music and more. It opened my eyes to the beauty and glamour of the 60′s and the following eras. I always felt I lived most of my life in the 60′s fantasizing about Sean Connery up to the present Daniel Craig. Just think of the finale of Octopussy, where Bond enlists the help of an all-female circus troupe to attack the villain’s lair; into which he descends in a Union Jack hot air balloon. With a fabulous comic turn from Q. Followed by a fight on top of a light aircraft, in flight. That was George MacDonald Fraser for you.
Do yourself a favour and check it out.
While wasting time on us, the sect grew stronger, bolder and better trained. The first step therefore is to unwind this narrative and honestly ask the right questions.”
2. Ch'Ti
Side note: I usually leave the cover commentary to others, but I have to say, the cover is beautiful. I love the tie-in to the abundance of purple in the novel.
It was fun. Most of us went back to his dads and hung out for a few more hours. Good time all around.
Metro Villiers
For he had seen with his minds eye what she had dreamed.
Hail, mortal!
Bacon is the first meat recommended for children and it can be given as early as the eighth month. Bacon is valued in the diet of the child because the fat is next to butter fat the most easily assimilated of the food fats and its protein is as easily digested as any other meat protein which is regarded as almost completely digested. Through experiments it has been shown that the average person utilizes 96.3 per cent of cooked bacon. For children bacon must be crisply cooked and the excess of fat drained from it. Portland OregonNews From a 1931 issue of Meat and Livestock News
What holds for H2O with respect to hydrogen and oxygen holds equally for persons with respect to neurons and genes, as well as social institutions such as governments, revolutionary groups, corporations, etc. These latter entities certainly emerge from persons, but they have irreducible powers in their own right and capacities to do things in the world. They are real, material beings. Moreover, while they emerge from smaller-scale entities like persons, these smaller-scale entities and larger-scale entities can be in conflict with one another. This is the whole point of my meditations on the strange mereology of onticology or materialist-oriented ontology. Far from erasing the myriad actors or actants that populate the world, emergentist materialisms give us back these entities. Just as Latour requested, we “get our materialism back“.
I laughed to myself about what was eventually going to happen when he contacted the real Kevin and mentioned that they’d shared a drink in his backyard. I really wanted to hear that exchange as Kevin denied being there, followed by utter confusion as both men tried to figure out exactly who the interloper had been.
If you can cut down on the biggest power draws, you stand to save the most money. Unfortunately, it’s tough to cut out your refrigerator, stove, air conditioning, heat, and the other large culprits on your electricity bill. Your computer, too draws a significant amount of power from the wall. Yet all of these things are essential to any comfortable living environment. Here are a few ways to cut down on their usage.
Make a template 2 inches wide by the needed length (6, or 12 inches, depending on the weapon). Place it against the nearest base edge of the firing figure, towards the closest model in the target unit. Any unit the template touches (except the one from the firing model) is affected, whether friend or foe.
Working in the creative industry, I don’t have a wardrobe divide where I have ‘corporate’ get ups and a sea of suits and shirts. I pretty much dress the same way I do outside of work. Lovely as it is, I do find that it doesn’t help my shopping addiction, as I justify each purchase by it’s pay-per-wear credentials.
“They really ought to spin these off into their own events when they get to this scale. The way they use the venue is pretty wasteful.”
There it is. Is he always right? When you point something out to him, does it ricochet right off of him and come back and hit you in the form of a verbal denial and blaming on his part? Is it always your fault by the time the conversation is over? If so, be assured, you aren’t imagining and you aren’t overreacting. This is absolutely abnormal and wrong. There is no way that in any relationship one person is always right and the other always wrong. Think about it. It is impossible.
Nights are noticeably long - endless dark hours seem darker when your evenings are lit by lamplight. If you wander out in the field after dark, the crisp moon nights are clear and cold and lit just enough to see where to put your feet. The grass is wet and there are sounds of roosting birds rearranging themselves in the hedgerow, a knotted layer of blackness in the black. When the moon is up behind the bare night tree bones all you can see of our house are a few orange lantern spots in the distance.
Culturally, the manager will understand the players as well as being able to immediately express his philosophy and ideas to the side in their own language.
When I found out my editor also wrote books, I was thrilled. Do you think being a writer gives you any extra insight when editing someone else's work? How does being a professional editor help your own writing process?
Last Week on the Blog
“For me it’s a reminder of the scale of our task. People turning away from an unpopular government doesn’t automatically mean they turn to Labour. People are increasingly recognising that the Tories promised change but that they turned out to be the same. However they also want to know about us.
I'm not even sure what snapped, but I do know a big moment for me was being asked to stand in my friend, Amy's wedding. I was in college, at my heaviest and I of course, said yes. She was my childhood best friend, how could I say no. A few months passed, we had all planned to meet at David's Bridal to pick out our dresses. I immediately looked at the other bridesmaids...yep, I was the biggest. The first dress, strapless, navy blue and actually very pretty. We picked that right away and then it was time for measurements...YIKES. I measured a size 24! WHAT? There's no way I had done that to myself, right? Oh it was true. I had remembered having to have a 8th grade dance dress "made" for myself since I was not the normal-looking 8th grader. But this was worse, WAY worse. So, I felt that fitting and cried the entire way back to college. The entire way.
“No, you’re ok.”
Taylor Kloss
Whatever has happened to nationalism in this country, things just seem to be getting worse, it seems that all that is produced is mutual enmity, acrimony and gigantic ego, whilst our nation’s fate grows ever perilous and the malignancy grows a pace. Today I and others look around and all we see is division, disunity and battle, individuals so caught up in ego are they that they strive to protect self much more so than people. For many it is party or site, leader or group yet never people, it is perhaps for this reason that I and others have left them to it over the years, realising that amongst the egos nationalism had little play, it seems that big fish in little ponds have always been a curse but the situation is now so very much worse and a movement for change suffers greatly.
Progressing through my years at QUT as a Bachelor of Music student, I have realized that my perceptions and thoughts of a musical career haven’t changed much since high school; I still want to be a renowned live performer and a touring musician. What I have come to realize is that in order for this to occur, I need to create connections with established persons within my local scene. After working for two years at Brisbane’s iconic music venue, The Zoo, the saying “it’s not what you know, it’s who you know” couldn’t be any more correct having met some of Australia’s favourite performers and personal solely through my association with this profession. What has impressed me most about working in this industry is watching other bands and strands of creativity support and champion each other. I find this aspect very ingenious about the Brisbane music scene and something I want to immerse myself in.
-YES/NO chants get fucking loud!
...our Lord unconditionally fulfilled His vow to provide the way for us to come back to God...
ENEMIES: Chris-R: He wants. His fucking. MONEY.
Themes are the overall subject of the style trend for the prom. This year, the well accepted theme is futuristic. This makes prom dresses for 2010 capture the shine and sparkle design. Go also with silver tones, gold embellishments, and other sleek accessories.
CONSERVATIVE: Pasty pasty pasty. Pasty pasty.
Moffat said: "It's entirely about story. I don't think in order to make Doctor Who successful in America you have to make stories set in America."
The FABLE (my fantasy baseball league) is not a hotbed for trade offers. In fact, most of the trades accepted in the league are due to my initiation. So, it was surprising to hear my Super Mario Brothers coin sound notification on my phone for an incoming email several times yesterday, most of which were trade offers from the dudes in my league. Hmmmmm.
The amount of time that I spend in Greece each year seems to be increasing and just this year it will sum up to six weeks. This also means dramatically increased amount of time spent over a Greek frappe someplace in the shade, letting my thoughts carry me away. And, curiously, weird and diverse thoughts tend to originate or at least pass through my brain over numerous frappes here in Greece, from taking radical steps into the unknown, to intercultural theories or revelations of the secret of Greek men. I am starting to believe good old Greek philosophers drank a lot of frappe as well.
While the daring tones are the ones that most tend to capture one’s attention, they are by no means the only thing that makes the fabulous designs so mesmerizing. Unexpected sheer details, textural contrasts, feminine fabrics such as lace and well defined cut-outs are some of the more subtle yet crucial elements that help produce a picture perfect outfit style.
My fellow Americans… how can this story not make your stomach turn? Is this a problem in the system? No. This is a result of the ignorant, hateful, selfish, biased, privalaged world view of some of the nurses and doctors in our hospitals. I can just see the snobby nurses turning their nose up at this helpless woman, due to her situation in life. As though, quality medical care is not something she deserved. I can see them treating her with indignity, like less of a creature and therefore not worthy of pity. I can see her crying out for help and being ignored, much as so many others that are left to die on the streets daily.
Former educator and author David Warlick blogs on his site about the use of new technology in education. Taking more of a generalist’s approach to topics of technology in education, this blog provides many of Warlick’s insights from his 35 years as a teacher.
Bill Irwin, Rachel Getting Married
but now had a TV
April is the American Library Association’s National Library Month. One of the themes of this year’s celebration of the importance of libraries is “create your own story.” The slogan refers to the concept that all library users may shape their own educational, occupational or recreational futures through regular use of the many free materials and services offered by public libraries. Library users may discover careers, develop relationships, acquire useful knowledge, and become inspired to achieve numerous life altering accomplishments. In doing so, they are creating their own stories. However, we have to wonder exactly what stories are being created in the current ominous economic environment?
Brought to you by:
Perhaps we can either get some of our current 800 men to cross train a bit in the 400, and/or get some of our 400 meter men that are currently running in the David Rudisha range (mid 45’s) to give the event a try.
binding or fabric for binding
The business card has already seen its heyday–and that heyday was likely linked to a bunch of CEOs scraping girthy, celebratory lines of cocaine off a boardroom table following a stock tip on some exciting new company called Enron.
And, have you had a chance to check out the new website for the Blood of Eden series? I have to admit that I had to watch the trailer multiple times before I figured out the password to get in to see the exclusive items which was not a hardship. In fact, I had a few people watching it with me and trying to count the Blood of Eden symbols.
This acknowledgement on Macpherson’s part reveals, yet again, confusion and incompetence. Determined to pursue the agenda of institutional anti-racism, Macpherson refuses to accept that: (i). the motive might be unknown, as demanded by a category B murder or; (ii) that it was anything other than racially motivated.
It was, according to the ODNB, while he was in practice in Southsea that Conan Doyle acquired as a patient Major-General Alfred Wilks Drayson, who ‘exposed him to theosophy’. When we started out to seek advice on the series we now call ‘Spiritualism and Esoteric Knowledge’ (and there was quite a lot of discussion about the series title), we were a little taken aback at the number of serious nineteenth-century people who took the whole area of spiritualism seriously. After all, Mesmer and his animal magnetism may have taken eighteenth-century Europe by storm, but even during his lifetime Da Ponte and Mozart could expect their audience to laugh at the idea of two silly and flirtatious girls being convinced by a ‘mesmerist’ doctor. The joke would not work if ‘he’ was just a fake medical man: ‘he’ needed to be a complete fake, performing a con trick full of cod Latin which only a woman would fall for.
'We try to be as accommodating as we can and make the play areas as safe as possible.'
some cornered
That sweet girl with Macey is Daphne
Thousands of Occupy Wall Street activists clashed with police across the country on Tuesday as they swarmed into the streets as part of the movement’s nationwide May Day protests.
It is Dacian’s ultimate goal to prove his worth to his parents by mapping the known world, thereby performing a great addition to the sum of human knowledge.
Music: Dance Song '97 by Sleater Kinney, my favorite band of all time.
Cute t-shirts, magazine-bead necklaces from Africa, baby blankets, cook books, Ethiopian coffee, you name it! One of the best parts was the endless supply of food! We had snacks available during the whole conference. There were these huge bins with around 12 different kinds of candy that you could just grab as you walk by. There was fruit, crackers, cheese, muffins, brownies, cookies, etc. There were coolers too where you could go by and grab as many drinks as you wanted, water or sodas or juice, etc. The meals were excellent! We had a taco bar the first night with all the toppings you would want! The next night we had grilled salmon, grilled chicken, green beans, mixed rice, rolls, salad, etc. We even had a popcorn and movie night/pajama party!
Alicia? Inked?? Yes folks, it's true! I am proud to say that I have a fantastic tattoo and am so glad. All of you know that my pups are my kids and so I wanted to commemorate my love for them. If that sounds strange, you don't have pets. :)
4:57: So if you are suffering from a low hormonal level, it isn’t really about your brain but more because you are acting like a little b***h and can’t thrust squat 400 lbs?
Anyway, we found the ideal place. Three steps, then the pool of water below the water feature against a wall. Mostly occupied, but people made room for us. Standing on the second step we could see quite a bit. Could also sit on that step. One row of people behind us on the third step. It was cool and under shade. The perfect spot.
Make a Cybermat
This morning on a return visit I indeed did get the raspberry wheat beer, and noted they have dropped the abv to 4.9% and refreshed the label on the Cornish IPA, and there is a new Bath Ales produced Ginger Ale which I passed on this time.
So in ending, goobye. I'll really miss you. Not really, but maybe if you think so, you'll have something to keep you from ending your pathetic existence by putting your head through the computer screen.
O LORD! Please give me and my descendants’ obedient hearts, so that we will love You with all of our hearts, and we shall continue to live in this land that You have given us, to Your glory in Christ Jesus, Amen!
I've been trying for some time now to get a second job. Well, I guess I should not have put so much energy out into the ether, because I will be working once more at the Boys and Girls club on my days off until the end of May. BUT, one of the guy's I work with decided to give his notice.
I will lose some weight
While John Boorman’s Deliverance (1972) plays at a local theater, Barnabas hopes to be delivered from his eternal curse of vampirism. But what he really suffers from is permanent befuddlement at a world that has passed him by.
Not bad considering your first gig with new member Arnar in March 2010! did Arnar complete the band in a very final way or will you add more members?
It sure makes my heart and soul just that much more at peace and happy to not feel those “bitches and moans” welling up inside of me. That just makes for a happier life.
But unfortunately we are still Earths. Most of our orbiters is space debris – or in our case – SPAM. The majority of the comments we get are from Spambots. Another challenge we face is how to sort out the space junk from the minimoons.
Shipping for 2 shares is $3.50, 3 shares is $4.50
and headed to Adelaide for
A singer in every sense of the word,
The Goal: Sub 1:40
toothbrush (this comes out as boobaash)
Sorry big and tall types- No Heaven for you!
Me: Oh. How about Aberystwyth and Cirencester?
The situation which led to my resignation of the whip has been well documented elsewhere on my blog. Suffice it to say here that following the leadership contest in summer 2010, in which the Chairman was successful, I could see clearly that after his re-election, the Chairman was unlikely to implement any of the changes that I and so many others had been calling for. So I reluctantly resigned the BNP whip at the GLA by way of protest. But instead of taking my concerns on board and formulating a plan for acting on then and thereby saving the Party from disaster, Head Office took the opportunity to expel me! (Please note, I have never resigned from the Party). Maybe it was because I had been seen as a thorn in the leadership’s side. After all, with my previous success record for getting things done and achieving groundbreaking results, perhaps I was seen as being just too pro-active, like all those others who had been culled over the years just because they showed too much ability. Perhaps given the number of times I’ve been sacked for no good reason, I should have seen it coming! But hindsight is a wonderful thing!
Date: April 21, 2011 4:12:45 PM EDT
“Susan was extremely helpful in making our first move in 44 years painless. It was a major undertaking. Thank you!”
Following the tragedy of the Second Great Intra-European War for Zion (WW2), the internationalist regime in London seized control of the economy by legally confiscating swathes of privately owned businesses, which were transferred into 'public ownership'. What is considered in the UK as Nationalisation, is in reality the Socialisation of the means of production and transport infrastructure.
Sadie stretched and stepped joyfully outside
Every word you say or speak is an affirmation. What have you affirmed today?
6.When someone asks you to do something, take a moment and listen. Keep a little A5 notepad, and make a note of it so you won’t forget. Check about 4 times through the day to make sure you haven’t missed something urgent.
1600 airfare for the parents over to EE
I have used the ideas from this website for a couple of years and I really like it. (My goal this year is to actually DO it on the timetable she suggests!) I can't say it any better - great tips, realistic, review your values so you have YOUR desired Christmas - it's wonderful. Organized Christmas, here we come. She has notebook pages already made out for you - all you have to do is print them out and fill them in. The planning is designed to be done by December 1 so you have the whole month to party and enjoy - so it starts this week!
never fear
I will need to redo a great deal of the earlier risqué E@L stuff retrospectively as Bruce stories, to give a semblance of character continuity.
Inspired by early morning walks amongst terrace gardens in Sydney's Paddington, the Paddington candle combines tulips and tuberose in a fragrance equally evocative of du Monde's Latrobe Terrace, Paddington location.
Speaking of food..., which weakens my heart and soul just to think of that...,
On the potential downside, I think a deterioration of the European financial crisis as began to occur in recent weeks is a major consideration, especially with Spain once again having trouble raising the funds it needs from the bond market and the fall of the Dutch government last week.
I could tell you all that has been said during the interview, but it was mainly just my adoption story and you can read it here. I’ll just cut down to the last bit of our interview.
As he opens and starts to read,
She dumped a foot of wet and heavy perfect for making snowmen snow!!
But I am talking too much and forgetting my last point. See, by now you know how good this fairness creams are. So I am coming with new idea that I am emailing just now only to Madam President. We are having Children’s Day, Mother-in-law’s Day, Valentine’s Day, etc. From next year, I am suggesting to have National Bleaching Day. On that day, all girls and boys can do national duty of bleaching their face (other things, I don’t want to mention). In a few years’ time, every Indian will become fair and then automatically they will become doctor or MBA (IT also OK). Then, in next generation, not even one Indian will be having natural skin colour. Really, so much pride Mother India will be bursting with when that is happening, no?
Guess not.
Todd Beamer, 32, Cranbury, N.J.
My continued silence is enough of an answer to him. His smirk widens, feline, predatory.
When did you start stitching, and what got you interested in it?
"What are you doing?" Madelyn asks, surprised.
! 15-ounce can of garbanzo beans/chickpeas drained (I used Eden brand, no BPA)
Could Raymond or Delia's friends imagine this?
We were planning on seeing another new waterfall on the way home, but a rockslide on Interstate 40 closed the highway, so we had to go home by a different route. That second waterfall will have to wait until we make another trip to Asheville.
So yeah, I'm wearing baby doll pinks now, daily. What do you think, Friends? Yay or nay?
1 Full wooden bead Alpha
typically, dogs have counts in the 170,000s.
This is the first photo of my first little Granddaughter P. She looks so laid back in this scan photo with her knees bent and it looks like she has her hands behind her head too. She is still a happy, laid back little girl but is full of fun and is as bright as a button :-)
When I'm home with her, I understand how this happens. I see the sparks. I hear her peals of laughter from the computer, or I see a painting in progress and hear her animated descriptions of her vision. And I know that she knows the notebooks are there, and I know she has every intention of getting back to them. It all makes sense. There's no chaos. The abandoned-for-the-moment notebooks are part of the rhythm. Do I know there might come a time when I need to ask her to clear the couch so we can sit down? Sure. But there's typically no urgency around that awareness.
*We don’t get much winters but we make sure to indulge in delight-sin-ful winter food comprised mostly of deep fried delicacies in whatever winter we get. Also, the onset of winter season begins with much feasting owing to the Hindu festival of Diwali, followed by New Year and ends with another Hindu festival of Holi.
Did you see my little bluebird? It's glued to the top corner of the chalkboard. It broke off a Mary Engelbreit item (can't even remember what it was) and I just thought it was so stinkin' cute I had to save it and bring me some cheer. Glue's a marvelous thing!
Session Suspended.
A combination of neighborhood demographics and “the boa constrictor” problem may make for some very overcrowded kindergartens in Brooklyn next September, District 15 CEC President Jim Devore told the Brooklyn Eagle.
It very much reminded me of seeing the likes of seeing Terminator 2 3D at Universal, the excitement just builds and builds and if you weren’t excited before then shame on you, but you now feel a step closer, to what we aren’t sure, but its progress.
Larry took Rachel and Jake on a lunch date to the local shooting range this week. Apparently you can't just go into the hills and do target shooting. The first problem would be that there are no hills in Louisiana. At least not down here. Way up Norf' they get some. Everyone here pays to go to a range.
And then the song of each member of these States.
and she put in the box:
KEEP OFF THE GRASS!
Probably not. Private equity firms such as Bain play a vital role in any kind of capitalist system, the healthy ones as well as those which are grievously wounded, such as our own. They recognize there will always be winners and losers. Bain has probably saved more jobs on balance than they have devoured. They have created success stories from the ashes of creative destruction. Some companies, such as Staples, have survived thanks to Bain, and gone on to prosper, expand, and thrive.
Which brings us back to the myth of the Noble Savage; when the inevitable clash of ‘cocoons’ occurred, some survived better than others and some perished, like the original Noble Savages on their erotic islands - ravaged by venereal disease. In all fairness to their 15-century European conquerors; viruses are also just follow their Darwinian programming to expand their ‘world/existence’ whenever and wherever possible. And it will be brutally unfair towards Westerners to hold them responsible (via White Guilt) for the, then unknown, clash of microbiological ‘cocoons’ caused by their loins. The aforementioned tragedy has, thanks to advances in science, little chance of occurring again – simply because we do have the innate ability to recognize the error of our ways. To be able to do so automatically implies progressive behaviour; something which, given the human condition 2000 years ago, needs no further explanation. Why? Well, error recognition is based, for the most part, on our innate rational ability to recognize patterns. Whether it is the EU’s recognition that Nietzsche’s ‘will to power’ or Fukuyama’s ‘need for/of recognition’ drove individuals like Hitler or Napoleon to be the authors of their socio-cultural locale’s collective discontent, or Einstein’s recognition that mass increases in proportion to an increase in speed, the fact remains that pattern recognition is fundamental to any rational understanding of the truth we so desperately try our utmost to approximate. So, when a Noble Savage in South Africa deems it necessary to kill an innocent person simply because a purely random natural phenomenon like a lightning strike occurred, then we are, as rational beings, obligated to ask if there is actually some or other universally recognizable pattern that justifies this specific course of action. Now, I’m not even going to be politically correct by trying to honour any Noble Savage belief-system by using every-day examples (and experience) to disprove this primitive nonsense. It suffices to say that no universally recognizable pattern will ever emerge when examining such despicably barbaric actions that, ultimately, only succeed in negating all the collective knowledge humanity has painfully gathered over the ages.
Was it this artist’s intention to be offensive and controversial? Perhaps. But then, don’t we all also know instances when we say things we later regret? When a momentary emotional outburst was needed, but the burned bridges, salted fields, and desolate villages we leave behind were never considered? When we used napalm instead of ten calm seconds before we act? When we shoot first and ask questions later? When we express things that we feel at the moment, but don’t stop to think it would hurt people we care about? Don’t we all make mistakes in communication at times?
I felt stupid; so, so stupid. I looked at Dominique through apologetic eyes, but she just screwed me. She was pissed.
-Lucy has had a steady rattling cough with no other symptoms for about two weeks now.
Now, this "rule" only applies to friends. We have a small, separate family birthday gathering, and grandparents and aunts and uncles are absolutely free to give traditional, tangible gifts. We're not ogres, after all. But again, these gifts received from her family are all the more appreciated because they are the only ones she receives.
ACTRESS - R.I.P
My first blooms for my iris. I believe it is one of my cemetery iris collection. This is the first time it has ever bloomed for me even though I have had it a few years. I used to have a white one that boomed first but I transplanted it into a bad spot and all I get is foliage. It will be moved soon for next year.
to go on... GO! As a result of only having 7 days to do it in, it means I have free play on the design – YEAHY my favourite! (This was confirmed by the bride) However this also means I have to make the perfect three tiered wedding cake, with perfect decorations, for a bride who wants everything perfect for her perfect wedding day… IN 7 DAYS!!!!!
-Phil
...and whatever else comes up. We'll have family in town for a couple weeks so we'll be busy with them too.
5) Line a muffin pan with liners. Divide mixture evenly between muffin cups, filling each to three-quarters full. Bake for 20-25 minutes or until muffins are well risen.
Add the cooked rice to this mixture with enough salt and the ghee.
Another poem also from TS Eliot’s Four Quartet. This excerpt is the first of the quartet Burnt Norton.
Vergieva T, Zaikov KH, Palatov S. Study of the embryotoxic action of styrene. Khig Zdraveopaz 1979; 22: 39-43, 1979.
You never forget a good book. Every now and then I like to take a favourite book off my shelf and revisit the story. It can take me back to a time in my life when the story first resonated with me. Sometimes I can read a passage for the umpteenth time and discover a new meaning behind the words.
Just another day in the neighborhood.
All right, readers. Here is your assignment for the coming week: go to www.luceromusic.com and check out Lucero, then go to www.lestatmusic.com and check out Lestat, and finally, realize that words are powerful, but sometimes they aren’t enough. Sometimes nothing can save you.
Now, so many years on, when we have been drinking my aunt and I talk about how old her son would have been now, how handsome. I feel dizzy to think that my life travelled on, I grew up, I gave my parents grandkids. But I like to bring him into our talk. My Aunt is not sure whether to believe me, but this boy often comes to me, he is a man now, sending her comfort.
Me: Crazy, I know.
"There have been a number of cases across Gauteng, and we're now getting ready for the Free State and gearing up for potential action there," Friedland said.
5. I know you're wondering how the low carb thing is going. Hold on, let me put down these Cheez Its. There. Did that answer your question? I'm hoping I'll do better this summer, with the threat of the pool looming over my head.
2) The Ides of March is still un-brewed. This is not cool. The IoM will be brewed this year, just a bit late, so more like, Ides of July.
It is not necessary to say that something is disqualified from being a naturalistic explanation if its cause is actually not natural, since in the case of the Big Bang episode one the actual cause may just be God. One is not scientifically committing themselves to God once they admit the Big Bang, first because that is outside of the scope of science in principle, but also because there is an alternative: the Multi-verse. Of course, somebody who believes the Big Bang is a scientific explanation is also not committing themselves to anything like the multi-verse. In fact, there may be good reasons to think that no naturalistic causal account of the universe is even possible (the multi-verse will not even push the issue back a step if one simply means by the universe the whole of nature, and by the big bang some finite beginning to it – and the Borde Guth Vilenkin theorem proves that a multi-verse system requires something like its own big-bang episode). Therefore good explanations, themselves otherwise naturalistic, might commit us philosophically to super-natural causes without committing us scientifically to them. Moreover, science leaves us free to do good philosophy without pretending that science can ever do the job of philosophy, and thus science may license the claim that supernatural causes can be reasonably inferred without science committing itself to such supernatural causes. This is why it is reasonable, for instance, to have arguments over why the universe is intelligible at all and why science works, and to propose God as the best philosophical explanation for the curious usefulness of science. That argument may or may not be good, but it is obviously not for science to decide, but for philosophy. With all this in view, it becomes clear that the Big Bang is closer to implying super-naturalism than Intelligent Design.
Speaking of being "Edified", have you watched the conversation?
“Project Runway” host and model Heidi Klum used to have a very pretty jewelry line on QVC that incorporated a clover design.
While efficiency can be applied with some degree of precision, equity or economic equality is another matter. Many believe that equity means an equal distribution of income or wealth. Fairness could therefore imply addressing the issue of poverty. The idea of economic justice and to what extent government should subsidize the poor through economic assistance continues to be a topic of discussion among political leaders.
Benjamin: You know, sometimes all you need is twenty seconds of insane courage. Just literally twenty seconds of just embarrassing bravery. And I promise you, something great will come of it.
Now, something a little more serious -
Their success and the failure of 'Team Sturgeon' to establish a powerhouse in the city chambers, gives them pole position to bring forward the heir to Alex Salmond which I suspect is John Swinney or another one of their big hitters.
I never posted Part 2 of what I learned in my six months away. I’m sure I would have gone on and on about how great it was to be away from everything. But I gotta say, coming back is pretty amazing too.
I also realized that while STOP grabs my attention, BE CAREFUL feels more like a suggestion.
The exercise simulated a “high-wind” event, similar to a tornado touching down in the park. Mock victims were given moulage (stage makeup) to make their injuries appear as realistic as possible. The “victims” were then spread out in the park to be found by CERT members conducting search-and-rescue operations. Once victims were located, they were triaged and packaged for transport to the medical treatment area, where additional CERT members “treated” their wounds and prepared them for transport to a hospital via ambulance.
In Texas, the Open Beaches Act requires owners to move their houses when erosion brings the beach to their foundations. After Hurricane Alicia, in 1983, about 100 houses in Galveston had to be moved, Dr. Leatherman said.
“Yeah too many at that,” Jeremy said. “Look, before we get too carried away with this, let’s do a little research into Mitch first. Let’s take a look at friends, family, and associates. Maybe we’ll find something there.”
So I was standing in my computer room AKA the catch all room, looking at my craft racks. I stopped to gaze at my Cricket machine and many of the other supply items I have stored on my shelf. I love my hobby and it's so expensive. Can I really afford to go??
Drawing skills are an important skill for any designer, but especially for user experience design.
long ago,
1) Add your flight details
One day, I was sitting in my bedroom, alone, when the noise started up. I ran to the door and attempted to leave the room. I grabbed the doorknob and it wouldn’t budge. Panicking, I shook the door and pulled wildly. Finally, after about a minute of this terror, the door opened.
But Yogi Berra wasn't a first-ballot Hall of Famer. Juan Marichal wasn't a first-ballot Hall of Famer. Larry Doby wasn't voted in at all by the writers, nor was Johnny Mize or Arky Vaughan, who was probably the greatest shortstop between Wagner and Ripken. I don't want a Hall of Fame without them. I'd rather have a Hall of Fame WITH Yogi Berra and Juan Marichal and Larry Doby than one WITHOUT Jim Rice and Bruce Sutter. That's not close for me. I am a Big Hall guy. I understand others aren't.
5. Emiliana Torrini - "Big Jumps"
I have never been a great fan of Faulkner's novels, with the possible exception of Light in August. Had I been given another chance to meet the author, however, I would have asked him a question that has puzzled me for years. The question relates to two quotes, one the soliloquy from Macbeth that inspired the title of Faulkner's fourth novel, The Sound and the Fury, and the other being from Faulkner's Nobel Prize acceptance speech. In Macbeth's soliloquy, Shakespeare wrote:
Sauce:
You have the choice at any time to break this lower dimensional cycle and start a cycle of your own, a cycle that will Create based on what you truly want, not what your unhappy ego wishes you to want. At any moment, it simply takes making a real effort to feel only joy and happiness and to not let the lower and dense emotions get you ‘down’ and keep you feeding the cycle of the lower vibrations. It is much easier said than done, as we have noticed that once you are fully immersed in the cycle of unhappy Creations, it is like trying to swim to the surface of quicksand in an almost literal energetic way.
This book, I thought, was typical Patterson. Quick moving, 1-2 page chapters, not a lot of depth but enough action to keep me flipping the pages. I did however, have a patron who came in saying she was downright disgusted by this book and upset that Patterson would "stoop to this level". She was talking about the killing of kids, something that I don't have a problem with but apparently she was outraged. When Patterson's latest book came out I asked if she'd read it and she said, "Nope, and don't think I'm gonna." Did Patterson go to far? I don't know. I'll continue to read his books just because I need a little brain candy now and again.
Did anyone who had anything to do with this PSA take it seriously? Are there actually people in the government who believe that some jackass will hear it, pull over to the side of the road, and write down the phone number to call for a pamphlet with tips about raising kids?
Loose-fitting straight dress with high V-neckline, has cap sleeves; contour buttoned belt. Pockets in side seams. Slightly fitted double-breasted jacket with bias collar, has seven-eighths length kimono sleeves with gussets.
Impact of Islam on Women
Before leaving the office, the mom shared with our volunteer that a week ago she and her mother had made the decision to follow Christ!
Finally, someone came out to get me and bring me into his treatment room. Alex was hooked up to monitors, had oxygen leads in his nose, and an iv hook up already inserted by the time I saw him.
Our first project was to re-do the kitchen table area.
thirteen almost fourteen years old,
feel like coffins.
I feel proud to have been part of this. That reader now has a will because of something that I wrote. Should he die tomorrow (and I hope he doesn't!), his family will find the administration of sorting out his finances much simpler. In a small way, I have influenced that reader's life. (Or perhaps I mean the aftermath of his death!) Seeing his letter in the magazine though, brought it home that what we write can affect people's lives.
yeah, that's right. the biggest migration in history. this summer may be my person hell. lets hope that is temporary. i can't handle walking the dog in fear every day! oh, and one other weird thing, i have a quarter sized butterfly tattoo on my hip. yes, it's true. it's something i got on a whim on a high school grad trip with friends (my best friend was basically like, lets get tattoos, here's one for you, and i was all, ok), and while i know it's weird, i definitely don't regret it.
Rum, triple sec, lime and a lemon twist – Mrs CJ’s favourite – deliciously citrussy from the limited samples I was allowed!
In the meantime, the interior of the helmet was painted black because (1) looks better and (2) no one can see your eyes and the interior white glare. I also wanted to buy a military helmet and use its foaming and pads. Details to come.
I spent the next 8 hours in a semi-conscious state of pain. Never having been through childbirth before, contractions seem to be exactly like menstrual cramps - just more painful and much more frequent, as I learned to my dismay. Apparently mine were pretty bad, as the nurses pumped me full of pain-relieving meds and narcotics through my IV and also gave me pills to take, and seemed surprised that I was still in pain.
You will give yourself a bath.
At her UNMC lab, research is done on respiratory diseases such as asthma and chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) and other environmental factors such as meth.
3) Trying to get organized is a never ending process- one I wish I could finish soon. Although it did help taking one of my love seats to the dumpster (it really needed to go), maybe this weekend I'll take a load of stuff to the Salvation Army.
sewing with my NEW baby...
God was in the water that day
Some of the victims of violence were shot dead by the police while demonstrating against injustice. Some were tortured to death. Some were kidnapped or ambushed or led into traps, and then killed. Some died when car bombs and limpet mines exploded.
If you’re not familiar with galgos, they come from Spain, are in the sighthound family (which includes greyhounds), and come in two varieties: smooth- and rough-coat. They are used for hunting game. It is because of what befalls to too many of them when they are no longer wanted for hunting that prompted a number of people to form adoption groups to get them out of Spain. Many galgos are adopted in Europe and in the US.
I tried not to get my hopes up.
May still be salvageable
Which makes you dumber--being sober and carrying a concealed weapon, or getting loaded then getting in your car and driving home?
Now if I might take a little liberty here, this is a masterpiece. The chorus is about a fool, a relationship and a blowjob. All happening at the same time! I think most people find it irritating when friends or girlfriends are too sensitive and sticky-icky. But the funny thing is that you actually kinda like it. Yeah, I know. Nobody likes a wordsmith so I’ll get to the point. This song is about instability which is, when you think about it, the cornerstone in any relationship. The blowjob analogy wasn’t really my intention, people listening to it have come up with it themselves.
Can I just say, "Perfect Lip Gloss Ever!!" and smashbox, if you would like to send me a year supply I would be ever so thankful!! I love this gloss!
Josh Grant's puritan upbringing by Amish grandparents did not prepare him for life as a city cop. It did prepare him to live as a reclusive farmer in the mountains of Southern Idaho where he relocated. The lifestyle served as his personal pergatory to atone for his self-imposed guilt for not protecting his wife and son from the drug ravaged city crime. His isolated hideaway, where the only responsibility was to his animals, served as santuary for a while.
Pubic Topiary.
Bobo: I'm the guy you work for huh? Well in that case I may just flush you down the toilet.
Associated Press put out a great article today, that reminded me of something my son and I discussed at length during his first days of Kindgergarten. Conversation:
Another dog decided to come and sniff at my chips and curry whilst sitting on the bench at the top of the park, he wasn’t having one, I didn’t want the owner to tell me off for making his dog have a poorly tummy.
Fast forward.
So after talking with my lit coach after school about something else, we were talking about next year and she encouraged me to email Mrs. Principal and just let her know I'd like to be considered for anything that might be open in 4th or 5th. So after school I did just that. I also said if there were to be any split classes (not unlikely) that I'd like her to consider me for those as long as they are 3/4 or 4/5. I do not want to deal with a half MEAP and half not MEAP. Lame.
Canticle: A Song of Judith
Medicine
However, my inner beige to-the-right-of-Ghengis-Khan upbringing was the persona that actually got a run when I heard WHY they were on strike. In a country where the average wage is US$1.19 per hour, and most people still live at subsistence level, these people were on strike because:
Full Bore, Hunter's Brewery,
how they could be so strong
MOST LAPS: 4 drivers cracked the century mark, Schumacher (144) , Petrov (112) , Massa (106) and Senna (100).
I pass a few signs warning me to slow to 50, then 45, and finally down to 25 and another that welcomes me to the old town of Leonville. The highway crosses over the Bayou Teche on a small, low cement bridge and right there near her east bank is Champagne’s grocery. In this part of Louisiana Champagne’s is pronounced Shom – pines, and the boudin there is one of the best in Acadiana. I walk back to the rear of the store, near their meat counter and order link of jalapeño boudin. I pay and head out to the bike in the parking lot. Leaning on the saddle and propped up against my still warm bike, I devour my breakfast link and wash it down with a very cold Coca Cola. I stuff the wax paper into the outdoor trashcan near the gas pumps and notice that it is filled with pork fat stained wax paper – It appears I’m not the only one eating boudin in Leonville this morning.
My friend said it this way. I liked you because you were real, even though you weren’t real. It’s hard to believe you could fake real. Is that possible?
It’s about sexism.
Do you like to golf? Consider visiting Maui this November for the Maui Aloha Golf Classic scheduled for November 10 and 11, 2012 with the Kick-Off Party to take place on Friday, November 9th. For more information about the event please visit www.mauinokaoigolf.com or call Charlie Aruda, 244-5234.
* Russell Smith (Amazing Rhythm Aces)
If the communication is not face to face also remember never respond to a message immediately if you are angry – wait till you have calmed down or you will say the wrong things, but be careful not to delay responding too long – if you can’t say anything nice then a polite ‘I’m sorry I really can’t reply right now, I will get back to you when I can’ will let the other person know you will come back – but make sure you don’t use this to fob them off and not come back with a reply at all, the BP’s ability to trust is weak enough already.
We began by saying that the shepherds and the women at the tomb enjoyed the highest possible privilege: hearing the Good News of God's merciful love for fallen mankind, His redeeming grace for hopeless sinners. We celebrate today that same message, rejoicing that we too enjoy the privilege of knowing Jesus Christ as Lord and Saviour. And at His Christmas Altar He says to us, as He said to Thomas, "be not faithless but believing." LKW
At a certain point during that program, in response to a question, the President half wondered aloud as to whether the campaign against the disease should be such as to instill the fear of God and death into the population. With a third of the population endangered, drastic measures were called for, and it was therefore no wonder that this idea of doing nation wide campaigning focusing on ways of engendering fear and terrifying the population should have occurred to him.
TNR animals tend to stay in the area, which keeps others out, neutered males fight less and there are no kittens, she said.
But we can only relate to packs of (a) a finite size and (b) a distinctive nature that allows for identification. Even when (b) applies – as in the US – (a) would become a problem if people felt that their ‘state-pack’ rights were being abused.
But in the case of Naser Al Raas, the otherwise muscular Harper government appears to have turned into a cowering pedant of jurisprudence.
“IN PAIN CALL TODAY” reads the unpunctuated sign outside Access Chiropractic Center, a small practice in my hometown of Rock Hill.
One is only 1/2 as powerful as two!
When you decided disassemble your computers or remote control car to fix it, be sure to take a picture on how it look before you started working on it. This will allow you to at least revert any damages that is caused by you "fixing it".
Once caramelized, its time to set the pan on a baking sheet and seal with a crust of some sort. This skillet was HOT! Check out the bubbling brown butter/sugar goodness...
This guy, let's call him R.J. (names have not been changed to protect the guilty) and I met in July at a restaurant I go to a lot. He came up to me and started talking to me, but I was in the midst of grieving over a good friend who had passed away that week, and more worried about drowning my sorrows than hooking up with anyone. Needless to say, I was not the most approachable person that evening and blew him off. A few days later he found me on facebook, and sent me a message. I ignored the request and message, but the next week, he was back at the restaurant again and I was a little more able to talk to people, so I let him buy me a drink. He got my number and asked me out for the next week, and I hesitantly said okay (I hadn't been on a REAL date in years, unless you count going to a bar with a guy and paying for my own drinks as a REAL date).
How does he keep me when my fuel tank for death defying missions is empty?
Maybe the best part of Fijian culture we got to experience was the lovo, the meal cooked in an earth oven. For special events and celebrations (or tourists who want to see one!), Fijians prepare a lovo. They start by digging a small hole and filling it with wood, then piling rocks on top. They build a fire and let it burn for a couple of hours, to heat the rocks. When the rocks are hot, they prepare the food — anything you can cook can go in a lovo, including fish, chicken, whole pigs (!), taro, sweet potato, taro leaves wrapped in coconut (amazing), and more.
I seem to remember a lot more company reviews in previous editions of The Fine Print of Self-Publishing and Levine does disclose that he omitted Mill Street Press for this one because of his business connection with Click Industries, a company owned by Levine, which invested in Mill City Press. Levine also points out that Mill City Press uses a different model of publishing than many of the companies reviewed in the book. Indeed, most of the companies reviewed are predominantly users of POD (print on demand). Therein lies the crucial caveat. The better ‘self-publishing companies’, like Mill City Press, are moving their publishing models to digital short run, because they realise to properly market a book from the get-go, you have to have upfront physical stock to be taken seriously by wholesalers and retailers. For that reason, I’d like to have seen a broader spectrum of self-publishing services. There are also other companies that have ceased to exist or merged with other companies, but I couldn’t help feeling that there were companies Levine really needed to cover that reflect a changing area of publishing—companies like Vantage Press, transformed under the direction of David Lamb, and there was limited mention of ebooks and platforms like Smashwords which may become the initial first step for self-publishers in the near future.
A theory: I bet after October, when people are no longer doing searches on the phrase "Oktoberfest," the hits will dip back down.
This is a short letter of support.
The weirdness factor increases somewhat when we hit the sunflower fields of Kansas and meet Dr. Jolly; the spooky look he gives Steven while out the middle of the road will cause you to loose a fair amount of your precious urine.
You are interested too. You have such a curiosity about you. You look at the sky and marvel that you get to be human and have the ability to look at the sky yet you also consider that you are quite little in size in reality. Not irrelevant of course. You are totally relevant!
I hope she likes it.
I fear for her.
negativity from Earth. All programs in place to intimidate with fear
Justice and peace has, in the U.K., often been interpreted as ‘soft’ issues, that the middle classes can protest safely, for example, nuclear weapons and their disarmament, or ecological issues. I call them ‘soft’ because they do not impact our daily lives, even though we live in the shadow of nuclear destruction and environmental pollution (I am suspicious of ‘Climate Change’ being treated as a pseudo-religion, one which supplants the Gospel in the minds of too many Catholics and Christians; the only unforgiveable sin for them seems to be one’s ‘carbon footprint’). The things which do impact our daily lives are abortion, employment, just wages, euthanasia, the poison of contraception, and the erosion of both marriage and the family.
www.indrasgrace.com
Inkers: Norm Rapmund, Sal Regla, Marlo Alquiza and John Livesay
"Promise me you'll always remember: You're braver than you believe, and stronger than you seem, and smarter than you think." - Christopher Robin to Winnie the Pooh :)
Observation: It is intended to be shocking, but I don’t understand completely yet how shocking I am supposed to be with my journaling to deliver the Good News to the most people. If I take my cues from Jesus, I will be unashamed of whatever God reveals to me and whatever way he gives me to share it with others. I hope that everyone that reads this 6th chapter of John’s Gospel will come to the conclusion that they should seek out conversion and repentance, along with me, to accept the truth that Jesus is truly present in the Eucharistic bread and wine at Mass.
That’s all I got folks! enjoy, and stay up late!
Because I was just thinkin the same thing about you."
If you learn more about food & drinks you learn more about flavours, you also achieve extreme joy in the consumption. You learn about the flavours. The different compounds and delightful sensations. Your mind broadens.
Styles by Danielle Main Store LM is below, so grab it and have fun & Happy Shopping!
Finally, a movie-company to round these case studies off. Pixar was originally bought by Georg Lucas, then taken over by Steve Jobs and is now part of Disney. Over the years, Pixar has pioneered innovation in technology and screen design and won several awards, including many Oscars. The company lives from its talent pool of creative and technical experts.
The Civil Rights movement ended the denial of voting rights and other basic rights to African Americans. Dr. King’s vision was far deeper than just ending racial discrimination. Dr. King founded the Southern Christian Leadership Conference to “save the soul of America.”
So again I place the call: Does anyone have *nice* transfers, in FLAC, of either Breaking Circus EP? Someone somewhere has to read this blog, have a near-mint copy of the record(s), and has the ability and capacity to transfer them to FLAC on nice equipment. If I had the records I would, but my setup is less than ideal for good-quality playings off vinyl.
the prosecution “covers up” its evidence.
2. New heat pump and ducting was installed.
find me at your side.
Last night's racers had a good breeze, but it was more than brisk. Down right chilly. Even the racers felt that way, even if they were moving a bit more than we.
Believe me, you do not want to sitting next to the cymbals during the overture to 'Carmen'.
If I buy this linen set
(The editorial office of a family newspaper. In the central trough an Editor wallows, humming off-key snatches of "Rule Britannia" and submerging to blow bubbles in the ordure when he can't remember the words. His labours are interruped by a mobile ringtone bleeping the theme from "Rupert the Bear".)
142. Sun Also Rises, The: Ernest Hemingway
This "frisbee" was his absolute most favorite toy -- a soft, round, colorful, donut-shaped toy that had 4 squeakers in it -- one squeaker for each color. He'd had it since he was a puppy and, over the years, the squeakers would stop working and I'd have to replace them. Early on, I had bought a bag of replacement squeakers so, when needed, I'd perform surgery on the toy to replace the broken parts just so I could keep his favorite toy in working order -- talk about a dedicated mom.
As always, feel free to share the information from this blog with others. Reprint it, forward it and include it in your newsletter — all I ask is that you give me credit and include a link to the blog. Thanks.
And I've saved the best for last. The devil.
In fact the pipelines could pose a great risk to the environment and also to peoples livelihood.
This is a way to keep supporters to get contact with other parties, thus the chance of shifting of support can be avoided.
Sing it how comes. Don’t worry about anything, let the song guide you.
2 solemn
The top- seeded Bulls looked as if they were on a collision course with the white-hot Miami Heat for the right to represent the Eastern Conference in the NBA Finals. The Bulls were cruising to an easy victory against the eighth seeded Philadelphia 76’ers. Then Chicago’s worse scenario materialized right in front of the 20,000 plus fans at The United Center. With a little more than a minute to go in the contest, the defending MVP Derrick Rose went down in agony holding his left knee. You could have heard a pin drop in that building. It turns out that he tore his ACL putting an end to his injury-riddled season.
Down the street, on to the dead end road. I walk it fast and jog until the muscle on the side of my left leg starts aching something awful. ‘Damn you monster,’ I want to scream as I slow it down and continue to walk at a fierce. I walk past the house of a lady who used to walk with me. Thankfully the driveway is empty because the muscle is screaming so loud I can’t go on. Sweat dripping, I remove my Nascar racing cap and towel my face dry as possible. Surely the universe is conspiring with this monster against me. I check my cell phone. I’ve walked about 40 minutes. It will have to do.
And that's all good. I'm fine with it.
be careful because there are different grinds, depending on the company/mill which is producing it: often you will see wheatlets #1 or 2 or 3. decide which is most appropriate for your recipe.
Whee. Fun times.
You can't squeeze a sedan through a 6" gap no matter how much you stretch the laws of physics. Grrrrr... It's raining and cold, so we're not gonna walk with two kids.
I am still learning how to listen when the universe is trying to tell me something. Sometimes the signs are so obvious, it's practically being screamed. But sometimes they are so subtle that you really have to be quiet and open up your ears. I have definitely learned that I need to be more open to the voices. Anyone else have a story about the universe trying to tell them something?
Shape dough into 1/4-inch balls. Place balls 2-inches apart on lined cookie sheets. Using the bottom of a drinking glass dipped in water and then sugar, flatten balls to 1-1/2-inch rounds.
Thackery jerked upwards. “What do you think you’re doing?”
It all started with bagels.
Context on the show: During filming of the climactic set piece in the action movie Radioactive Man the director gives the following instructions: “OK, listen up everybody: this is the hardest, most expensive scene in the movie, and we only get one shot at it so we have to do it right. Fallout Boy will untie Radioactive Man and pull him to safety moments before he’s hit with a forty-foot wall of sulfuric acid that will horribly burn everything in its path. Now, that’s real acid, so I want to see goggles, people!” Fallout Boy has disappeared from the set, however, and film star Rainier Wolfcastle is promptly carried away by a titanic wave of acid whilst screaming the above.
Could it be the best steak you ever tasted? It depends on whether you have ever spent more than £6.95 on a steak and chips dinner, I suppose - but I'd be happy to be proved wrong.
Change the voices in your head, make them like you instead
Please come visit the Paper Temptress community. You will be delighted with the variety of projects the DT showcase over there. Mojo gone? Come over for some neat ideas!
I bought this little Kraft colored jewelry box at Michael's. I thought about stamping on it and then I thought that might be kind of difficult with all the edges. Then I thought about wrapping it with the twine and making a tag, but all the tags were too big. So that's when I headed for the doilies. The first doily was too small (I'm feeling like Golidlocks here) the second doily was just right!
My husband used to be a Corpsman, which means that he knows how to amputate a leg with a credit card, but he isn't allowed to change bedpans at the hospital. He strongly believes that anything can be cured with superglue. And he's usually right.
Vicious War Steed – Veteran of the Alliance
Conjure a colorful fomenting flood.
When my husband and I were dating, she was already at the point of telling the same stories, over and over, but still had a sparkle in her eyes. In recent years she was diagnosed with Alzheimer's, which progressed very quickly. We have never lived close enough to witness the decline.
Kyle Alden found his spirit moved by the works of another artist in another time: William Butler Yeats. On a trip to Ireland, Alden visited sites associated with Yeats, and Alden decided to revisit Yeats’ poetry when he got home. Alden says that the music to The Cap and Bells wrote itself, and the rest of the songs here quickly followed. Yeats expressed a spirituality that was very much tied to the physical world. Nature and the lore of specific places were important to him. If you believe that magic can be tied to specific places, Alden appears to have absorbed some of that magic. His musical settings are not Irish music, but they more than do justice to their inspirations.
There is an unrelenting tyranny to demographics; the statistical study of migrations and birth rates of peoples throughout the world. Unless Europe and America address it, putting the breaks on further immigration, they are at risk of falling prey to it and failing as a result of it.
Funny how so many things we take for granted now days got their start in some truly bizarre ways!
There is no physical evidence, only eyewitness testimony from a man who chose someone other than Jamie in a physical line-up the week after the crime, even with Jamie standing right there. He did not name Jamie as the perpetrator until 8 years after the fact, 8 years in which he heard Jamie’s name repeated in the media and by investigators determined to clear this case. These same investigators gave that witness’s name and number to the victim’s mother. Even he asked them during an interview, “Why would you do that?”
Napkins with carrot embroidery from Williams Sonoma
These activities are aimed at giving them different skills to enable them to use various forms of media to express their understanding of issues that affect them.
At least, that is my opinion and you have been warned about where I stand with those already.
• Gunnison Brewery tapped a whiskey barrel-aged porter named Porterotti. The whiskey note was nicely done, not too big for the base beer, a well-turned porter. A fine job by Gunnison.
And this is the last story in season 2. This one's been a very bumpy ride. Some masterpieces and some full-on haddocks! I gave The Romans the highest rating, but my favourite story in this season has to be The Chase, it's a guilty pleasure. My least favourite is, unsurprisingly, The Web Planet. Out of a possible 90 I scored this season 49/90. Giving it an average score of 54/100. Unsurprisingly this season doesn't beat the first overall.
“What’s he talking about?” Laurel asked. “Who did you…?”
11: The lowest temperature ever recorded at the surface of the Earth was −89.2 °C at the Soviet Vostok Station in Antarctica on July 21, 1983. Wow! That was really cold! The second coldest was recorded between Noynoy and Corona just recently.
I thought about this the other day when I was in town at my pre-ban favourite cafe. Smokers used to sit upstairs. Ventilation was on, the window open in summer too. Ashtrays and tables always immaculate. Non smokers downstairs never complained.
He needs it least
A combined reader assembly for all optical sound formats and digital sound Dolby SR-D operates in reverse-scan mode so that damages in the emulsion only have small influence on the quality of sound reproduction. The threading of the film is simple and handled as usual. An additional reader assembly for digital Drive system with flange-connected synchronous motor. By request the projector can as well be equipped with the traditional flywheel optical sound device. High-sophisticated components, as gap optic and solar cells provide high quality sound scanning. Exciter lamps are already pre-adjusted for easy and quick replacement.
So much that is us, is not of our doing.
11. Rude World (Rough Mix 1 Page / Plant)
that locks me down into its prison cell.
Don't worry...No koalas have been harmed during my bento making process ;). Do you know that koalas are not only grey but there are some white ones too even though they're quite rare ? I wanted to make another koala-themed bento because I really like my first koala bento. I thought about using quail eggs and colouring them grey (but I really didn't know (and still don't know) how to get grey-coloured eggs), but then I remembered that not all koalas are grey, there are white ones too, how convenient, in the end I didn't even have to colour anything:). I decided to use mini mozzarella cheese instead of quail eggs to make the two mini white koalas, because I like the idea of eating pilaf with mozzarella. These mozzarella koalas are made out of: mozarella cheese, nori for eyes, black olive for the nose and chili sauce for the rosy cheeks.
Here is my sample:
Net sales increased 46% to $7.13 billion in the first quarter, compared with $4.89 billion in first quarter 2009. Excluding the $185 million favorable impact from year-over-year changes in foreign exchange rates throughout the quarter, net sales would have grown 42% compared with first quarter 2009.
-4 oz carton sour cream
- My dog got a haircut. :)
Energy sodas: 5
The infinite wildlife park: See the white animals in all their majestic glory.
Last night was a common experience in the fact that Loser Ninja was, well, just neato; as per usual. Loser Ninja is an apt term, because I didn’t realize that he was the actual definition of a loser when we started dating 2 ½ years ago, (“Bu-bu-but, Melissa! Who’s TSO and why are you ‘pining’ over them if you’ve been dating someone for so long? How is this possible?” Because it is. So there. TSO was THE greatest love of my life, I know that. Maybe there will be another even better, but as of right TSO is the cat’s knees and the bees pajamas- or however that goes. *smiles* Look, I never bought into the bs about one person for one person, you only have one great love, you’re made for only one other person. And that’s good or else I would be even more lonely, bitter, and angry then I am. TSO was my soulmate, as in we were literally the same person most of the time. Loser Ninja is a great love of my life. As is BoyToy and Mr. Ex. If that doesn’t make sense to you, then I don’t know what else to say. I’m an emotional whore then- deal with it. I am. *grins*) it snuck up on me.
Alum Cave trail starts out near Newfound Gap Road about 1/2 way up from Sugarlands to Newfound Gap. It's a VERY popular trail for several reasons, and the parking lots are nearly always full to overflowing by early morning. It's the shortest trail to Mt. LeConte, Alum Cave Bluff is an amazing sight in its own right, and there are a lot of great views from this very rocky trail that hugs the side of the mountain.
Is coaching being done on a daily basis??
Needless to say, I end up with a huge stack of books around my bed... some weeks, I have to literally leap over the stack to get into bed. And not to mention, there's a whole 'nother group of books that I have purchased and are on the reading list, too.... So this is library books and purchased books that I have to leap over. Serious exercise, I tell you.
I did find out that the ex is in town. Made me crazy for a while. The last time he was in town, he came to my house and left a note and then contacted a friend of mine demanding to see son and me. I decided to just lay low, go out as little as possible and make sure I go nowhere near where I know their stomping grounds are. It's been 4 years and he usually went about 3 years and then would start something so being it's the holidays and being in town, that combination would be a pretty strong trigger to make him start his crap again. I'm a little scared.
I hope that one lesson he has learned is that the level of the hierarchy’s rhetoric is way too high, and that there is a need for reconciliation, understanding, and healing. The apology is a good first step, but more steps need to be taken to heal the great chasm that exists between the hierarchy and LGBT people, especially LGBT Catholics.
A true guide for etiquette is difficult to put together. Much of it has to do with the individual person. I have found that those that are the rudest tend to get upset when it is done to them. I tend to use “do unto others as you wish done unto you” as my guide. I do the best I can in the fight. If I win I am not rude to my enemy, if I lose I am not rude. I have found many players that not only are much better at PvP and have better gear, but they also seem to be grown up enough to either just leave, or say “good fight.”
What I can say about the pairing of Emily Blunt and Jason Segel is that they both have obvious chemistry and use it well with the surprisingly slim amount of scenes they get together. Segel plays more of the straight-man role and Blunt pretty much plays his somewhat goofy, psychiatrist honey and both display a lot of fun working together on-screen, but the film shows more scenes of them apart than together. I wish the film focused more on them just hangin’ out, goofin’ off, or just simply being a loving couple, rather than just worrying they’re going to go next with their relationship and whether or not they’re going to work out. Just be happy and loving you damn kids! Even though you are both older than me!
Randy Bradbury - Bass
Antidepressant manufacturers claim that antidepressants cause neurogenesis.
Before you leap in and tell me about Quince Paste, let me say I tried making it one year. It becomes a seething, boiling, volcanic hell-hole of a saucepan. It spits lava at you. Hot, blistering lava. The only sensible way to stir it is with a towel wrapped around your arm.
A perfect example of time-consuming and low-calorie, pomegranate seeds are perfect for Sunday movie night. They're just sweet and tart enough to keep you coming back for more, but considering the work you have to do to get to each individual seed, even a whole pomegranate (a "whopping" 105 calories) will probably last you through an entire two hour movie. Plus they're a great source of potassium and vitamin C, meaning they're perfect for a day relaxing sore muscles.
Munich (DK)
Prepare and bake cake according to package directions.
I also do something similar when watching movies back when I was just a kid. When I get to a scene where it’s too heart-wrenching or disturbing for me t cope, I take the remote and skip to when it’s over. Same thing goes whenever I speed-read. Always, on my first read of a book I usually skim through most of the text and take note only of the conversations. Then, being more assured on how the story would go through, I take a more leisure pace on my second read to flesh out the events in my head instead of the rushed way I had done before.
Things go wrong because simultaneous ideologies are fleeting and people’s priorities change. If dating isn’t a top priority to you or the person you’re dating, the timing isn’t wrong, the desire is just not there (which could be related to timing, but we can tackle that at another time). Since we stopped dating, I’ve been confident that if The MBA really wanted to fit me into his life, he could have. To say we’re not dating anymore because of his “horrific schedule” is a cop out above all else. No harm, no foul though; I totally understand saving face.
‘Meeting Lydia‘ is about Marianne’s internet pursuit, via Friends Reunited, of a past relationship. It is the single thread upon which she hangs a thousand-and-one intricate scenes of self discovery; any one of which might be seen as an irrelevant distraction from the plot, but each of which is like one of those tiny shops or galleries you come across unexpectedly while looking for Debenhams. If all you want is a mainstream chain store, this book is not for you. But if what you love best is poking around in unique and idiosyncratically organised one-roomers where the owner can tell you who made everything and the names of their grandchildren, you are very much in luck.
“Sorry. I was going to mention it, but then I realized that it might sound a bit off putting. I hope it’s not a problem.”
I weeded the garlic. He hammered on the tiller with his big metal spoon.
(e) identify new research directions on innovation and development.
At Fairview Country Club, par 36
E-mail: aokin@brooklynbar.org
DONALDSON D 20020324, Bishopstowe farmer, KZN, gunned down by unknown assaillants
Following the fall of Robespierre and the Jacobins, those that took over the reigns of government in France tried to undo what they saw as the excesses of the Revolution. As such, on 20th May 1802 the Consulate - with Napoleon elected as First Consul - reintroduced slavery to France and her colonies. Napoleon went on to become sole ruler of France until he was defeated and the Monarchy was restored.
But the theme is not the worst of it. Superman IV is ridiculously poorly made. The special effects are cheap. The wire work on flying characters is often clearly visible. Characters hold entire conversations in airless space. But the worst of it is the editing. The original ending for the film was removed and placed in the middle with a new ending filmed. It not only did not make the movie better, it made the story incomprehensible. Te only way to get the full story coherently is to read the comic book adaptation.
The rash Calvin’s next key teaching is the U in TULIP, which is Unconditional Election. This term is all about Calvin’s warped idea of predestination. The meaning of this term is that not everyone has the possibility to have access into heaven. That is, God chooses whoever he wants to enter His Kingdom. So God chooses some to enter (referred to as the “elect”), and some not to. God doesn’t look at the lives of the elect to see if they are worthy for heaven, but only chooses based on his own intention. This horrifying belief makes our loving God seem to be ignorant of the good deeds of the world! The Calvinists try proving the one, true Catholic faith wrong through the Scriptures: the Calvinists say Christ died for his sheep (John 10:11), for his friends (John 15:13-14), and for the Church (Acts 20:28 and Ephesians 5:25). At this point, we can also cite the Sacred Scripture, but to prove Calvinists wrong: “Not everyone who says to me, ‘Lord, Lord,’ will enter the kingdom of heaven,but only the one who does the will of my Father in heaven (Matthew 7: 21).” Jesus’ words show us that no one will automatically go to heaven, and that only those who do the will of God can enter heaven. In Catholicism, the true meaning of predestination is that we were all called and chosen for heaven, and what man does is refuse to or answer this call. It is perceptible now that predestination is not what the irrational Calvin thought it was, that God chooses only whom he wishes to for entrance into heaven.
21. Pressure Drop
I am on assignment to cook food for the top officials of Citicorp and in one of their ‘themed’ dinners we were asked to create a ‘smoked fish’ for the ‘kebab’ dinner.
That’s a hard one. Ask my family and they will say crazy, ask my friends and they will say eclectic and arty, ask my day job co-workers and they would say tenacious and hard working.
I finally got rid of the old plastic planter I had drug from our last home 7 1/2 years ago. You know the fake terra cotta kind? And since it wasn't new when we moved it was more like 10 or 12 years old... I think the fake terra cotta has gotten a lot better looking in the last decade.
I remember when James and I loaded our ugly, thrift store furniture into a truck, boxed up all of our belongings, and moved into the neighborhood near your street. You were one of the very first people to say, "Hello!" But you didn't just say hello. You wrapped your arms around my waist and kissed my cheek and made me feel like I had stepped into the sunshine. It was warm and wonderful, and I knew we would be friends. You were one of the first to love my family. And you were easy to love in return.
I see you tomorrow with a Magnolia card!
Wow, I am so behind on blogging but I have great reasons! We left Italy in March, took "vaca" all of April/first week of May and then flew to Great Falls, Montana! We got here on May 6th and are currently staying in TLF! It is different, that is for sure and windy but I think it will be an ok "home" for a while! I can't wait to get out of Great Falls and see some of the beauty of Montana!
God is my top priority. And then of course the ministry. And my relationship with my amazing boyfriend! My day is always better when he’s in it……Anyway, my point is, God will bless us for getting our priorities straight- so when feeling stressed, take a moment, say a prayer, and know that God is in control! It’s a lot easier when we trust in Him.
Ben Rebukes narrator.
There are people with a heart for the Lord, just like Tim’s, around us every day. And there are people who are quiet and meek and content with thankless service as well.
It would be amiss to not mention this bloodbath of a musical also stars Paris Hilton as Amber Sweet, Largo’s surgery addicted daughter. Amber and her brothers Luigi and Pavi play key roles in the film, but their performances cannot stand up to those of Head and Vega.
Thanks to the folks over at hobbybrauer.de I became aware of this letter. Supposedly it was written by Bertolt Brecht in 1956, asking the Radeberger Brewery if he could be allocated some of their scarce and difficult-to-obtain beer.
And whatever you ask in my name, I will do, so that the Father may be glorified in the Son.
By expressing emotions Tanka connects our feelings to the observable world enabling us to envision a picture in the mind which perfectly conjoins explicit expressions of age-old emotions permitting the reader to feel as if ancient poems were written about today, not a thousand years ago
So we have decided, as we had visitors today, that Pretty Officer Sue and Tilly would go home with them, and that I would remain on the good ship Weyward Lady for the time being. POS is returning to me on Wednesday, when we meet up with Adam and Lucy, so the situation will be reviewed then.
- peanut butter is your kryptonite;
That's about to change. (Tire pun!) I look around for a handy spot to work; all the verges are covered in tall grass. I'd rather not become a tick magnet, so I walk the bike a few hundred yards down the road until I reach a mown area.
SS: Could you tell us a little about your emergence as a screenwriter? How many scripts had you written before you got your first job?
Place parchment paper on cookie sheets, and measure 1/4 cup of dough per cookie, carefully placing the portions on the paper to allow for spreading. Flatten each mound slightly.
To join the Beer and Cheese Club at Goose the Market (in conjunction with Hoosier Beer Geek), check out this PDF and then either call Goose the Market at 317-924-4944 or stop in the shop at 2503 N. Delaware St.
I used SB's Deckled Rectangles to cut out the image and the Doohickey Swirl Die. I stuck a doily behind Tilda and added some Prima and WOC flowers. The ribbon was salvaged from something or another and I used a SU scallop punch for the panel behind Tilda.
Yes, an army lorry had managed to drive off the road into a ditch. A little further up the road we came across his companions, parked up almost blocking the road. As all looked a state of confusion we dropped into the Local Police station in Gairloch to let them know of the potential hazards scattered on their roads. Rather fortunate, as The Army had already contacted them but had little idea of where their vehicles actually were, So much for GPS!
If you could choose only one time period and place to live, when and where would you live and why?
Walk 4.4mph or slower 1 minute, Run 6.7mph 1 minute
Happy Cinco de Mayo everyone!
Wow I can't believe it! And this doesn't count the hiatus to iVillage Weddings for a year.
At one point on the drive in on Wednesday (to martial arts) my eight year old complained that he had dropped his trousers in the footwell trying to get changed and the seat belt got stuck and my five year old threw up in my brand new special salad tupperware that you can separate the crunchy and the dressing. On the drive out we were nearly run off the slip road by some lady who thought she could pass me on the inside (oh, I laid on the horn) and my five year old threw up again in his nalgene. Tonight we didn’t get home until past eight, having gone to Kindergarten orientation and spending an hour and a half on a really uncomfortable chair that made my butt hurt. Then when we did get home the rain came down so hard you couldn’t even hear the thunder. My cat kept trying to sit on my laptop and help me type and I drank my tea before it was cold. I worked on all of these things without pulling out any hair…is this perserverance?
It was also during this time that I began to write. To date, though unpublished, I’ve written one young adult fantasy manuscript and several children’s stories – including an entire series on a pair of unlikely buddies, a dog named Angelo and a cat named Malcolm, that I will continue to write about so long as it makes me happy.
I love having something of my father-in-law’s in our son’s room. :)
Now I have a new camera with a short zoom lens which as you can see does not really get you up close and personal with skittish wildlife so I thought I would just keep moving forward quietly and see how close I could get. Here are the results of my efforts.
U.S. Federal Reserve officials, including Chairman Ben Bernanke, are scheduled to speak on Monday, Tuesday and Thursday and the New York Fed President William Dudley will testify in Congress on Tuesday.
I've bought a few things from the new Soap & Glory cosmetics range, but so far this has to be my favourite! The quad has 4 shades: Vanilla, a matte vanilla/white, Pink T, a darker nude shade, Mudhoney, a lovely dark matte brown, and Aubersheen, a sheer brown with lots of silver glitter.
Today I am finally in a place where I feel right with who I am when it comes to religion. I hate labeling myself as anything, but if I had to write it down on a form I have to say that I am an agnostic. Agnostics get a bad wrap as being wishy/washy or weak (by not being able to pick a side), this is not only from the religious but from the non-religious as well.
What an amazing evening packed full of entertainment! The first annual So You Think You Can Act was a huge success. All the celebrities brought their A-game to the event and surpassed expectations with solid performances of the nine scenes in the evening. In addition, emcee Big Daddy Tazz kept the audience entertained every moment and played off the panel of judges. Lee White, Kayla Gordon and Bob Metcalfe were impressive in terms of their ability to come up with insightful, hilarious and bizarre commentary that had the audience booing, cheering, laughing and thoroughly engaged.
As a people, we haven't seemed to quite get the fact that we are on a planet with finite resources and space. Like a body, it can only take so much abuse before each system starts to fail, and like the body, after a couple systems start going, the rest follow like dominoes.
Cathédrale de Sainte Sauveur
Now comes the fun part: Selling it to our shovel and lime neighbors. Remember the basics:
Of course it does make for extra work when you are trying to get out of your own driveway!
The ANC had zero knowledge or experience of government and they stepped in, got rid of everyone that could see what they were doing. The ANC did not get rid of the whites, only because they were so arrogant as to think they could actually run a first world country by themselves. The ANC got rid of the whites, because they realised the experienced whites would see what they were up to and they did not want that obstacle to their theft, fraud and corruption. They needed to get rid of everyone that would or could notice what they were doing on the inside.
Next, I want to thank everyone for being so patient during all of this. Well, everybody except the 73 text messages and 18 phone calls that my wife got while she was at work on Thursday. Seriously, people? Seriously? But I suppose I can understand. It would seem that the message that got out about my condition at the time was perhaps a little confusing. A few people seemed to think I had a 5% chance of making it through the night. I guess I'd kinda panic a little if I'd heard that too. Sometimes Twitter and Facebook can be a little misleading. Use caution when interpreting tweets and updates. ;)
Frankly, I cannot think of a better world than one that is entirely non-racist and colour-blind. I live in Shanghai, a city that shows all kinds of painful discrimination, discussed in a number of my posts. Perhaps intellectual Memela means by, “now wants to be colour-blind”, that various racial groups or displaced people (such as the San or those poor, displaced Zimbabweans) in South Africa should have their group identities respected and protected. In other words, society should not be blind to them. But our luminary does not make this clear. Onward we waffle.
Not much to even report sadly, and then I got an email about this book thingy from Domino which I have to say looks pretty amazing, 5 single sided flexi discs and a book with short stories/photos by the musicians and Bjorn Copeland of Black Dice designed the whole cover.
Every business has a bottom line: – “The project success”. Defining project success involves meeting the objectives of the project on time, with minimum expenditure, and where ever applicable, to make maximum profit with minimum investment. Project budgets are often driven by resource costs and efficient planning of resources.
One of the jamaats in Norway have put together a new site for muslim children with learning tools, games and coloring activities alhamdulillah.
“Me rat trap?”
Anyway, eventually we made it to Emily's with lots of delicious food. Ryann agreed to hold Brooks, but quickly freaked out :o). That afternoon she took over my coloring book, as usual. Then I impressed myself by making a complete train track, with only one piece left! Ryann told me I couldn't touch her sharp knife. Kid, if it is a sharp knife I would suggest not using your leg as a cutting board...
Do we assume they have children?
with a wooden sword
To ask a favor of a friend
He must become greater....I must become less. John 3:30
It became quiet inside. The swirling stopped. The distractions and to-dos were drowned out with a more-frequent communion with and awareness of Jesus. Laughter and fun, enjoyment of people and delight in the simple and daily, these settled right in and are asking to stay.
It’s another cute moment for them as she acknowledges a nice thing he’d done for her and when he gets another reminder to return home, he suggests they go somewhere else to hide from Grandma. Then they start to kill us with flashbacks. Lookie here writers, this stuff didn’t happen that long ago so we still remember.
"In addition to his refusal to grant us leave to appeal his earlier finding... acting Judge Halgryn went beyond the request before him and made a finding that the singing of the song incited the commission of murder and constituted hate speech," it said.
Italy, one of the biggest eurozone economies, fell into recession after its economy contracted by 0.2 percent in the third quarter and by 0.7 percent in the fourth quarter of 2011.
2. Tomorrow I finish a 55 hour week at work.
Walk the father, love you see
But then we get appearances by such familiar faces to a modern audience as Anjelica Houston (a year before picking up an Oscar for Prizzi's Honor) as a space pirate/amazon, Ron (Hellboy) Perlman as some poor pirate guy who keeps losing his hand, that ubiquitous comic/gag writer Bruce Vilanch as a lisping space being of some sort complete with a detachable head, and the inestimable John Carradine playing the Supreme Commander and getting such an easy time of it that he just has to lay back on a flat surface and say his lines. Almost as easy as his gig for 1981's Frankenstein Island. Just goes to show that for most actors, a paycheck is a paycheck is a paycheck, and some will do anything to earn one. These four sure did.
Temporariness is a difficult concept; therefore, so is childhood.
TM 11 - BubbleBeam
What about y'all? How did you spend last night?
This has been one of those weeks where I have been so busy that I have barely had time to think. Between my regular job, a deadline for a new writing gig I have landed (I will share details on that later), and the midnight premiere of The Hunger Games, I never had time to prepare a mash-up for today. I was going to find time to put one together and just post it much later when I received a message that I had been tagged by Lisa Hall-Wilson over at the blog she shares with Marcy Kennedy, Girls with Pens. Curious, I went to check it out and found that Lisa had tagged me in something called Lucky 7 Meme. Here are the rules:
But all that I know is you, your touch and your smile.
of the promise i shall keep
Frankly, it's uncomfortable.
But I’m sure that if you are a person who is mature enough and well grounded up then you understand that there SHOULD be something after this life. I think its an obvious fact that good things come from heaven and bad things come from hell. If someone will tell me that there is hell then I’m sure you won’t mind me asking what is the source of all the bad things that happen in this world? Same thing with question of heaven, if there is no heaven then where do the good things come from?
Christina is wearing one of our most popular designs (Lovi & Dovi™) Twisted Love tee with a pattern mini skirt and cute pink pumps. This outfit is very girly and fun to wear for the spring. Now available at retail stores in Southern California.
I've found some great posts this month including trips to Vienna, a review of The Hoxton Hotel in London and an eventful trip to Manchester to see Peppa Pig.
Now when I stress about my holiday schedule, I remember my parent's take on the season. While we enjoy many family traditions, I take a long look at my calendar deleting events that don't add to our closeness. I share with my children what my parents instilled. The greatest gift of all is the baby wrapped in swaddling clothes not expensive paper from the department store.
Paul Robinson (English Democrats) 73 (3.1%)
I know that seeing the real you
Part Three of the first disc replies to that and other criticisms, such as the fact that Esther’s own possible Bigfoot footage isn’t terribly convincing. But we’re jumping ahead…
grass of the endless between
May 2, Wed, at 6PM – PF Online Coaching with Mr. Wascher via Skype (TDA 6B class hour)
Imogen: Yes. It's not greasy or salty or crispy or fatty or delicious. But it still tastes just like bacon!
Examining the situation the friend remarked as usual, "This is good!" To
All cardioid microphones exhibit the "proximity" effect which boosts low frequencies
"Um, are, um, are you the voice?" she stammered, still shivering from her encounter with the icy black specks.
The arch of Angel’s Window.
